<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR881123-0027 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.11-23-88.f2.A1026</DOCID><TEXT><FTAG tagnum="4701"/><ITAG tagnum="90"><T4>Federal Register</T4> / Vol. 53, No. 226 / Wednesday, November 23,1988 / Proposed Rules<ITAG tagnum="52">ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION AGENCY</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">40 CFR Parts 122 and 403</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="41">[EN-FRL-3309-6]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">EPA Administered Permit Programs, The National Pollutant DischargeElimination System; General Pretreatment Regulations for Existing and NewSources, Proposals to Implement the Recommendations of the Domestic SewageStudy.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY:</T2> Environmental Protection Agency (EPA).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION:</T2> Proposed rule.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY:</T2> The Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) today is proposingto amend the General Pretreatment and the National Pollutant DischargeElimination System regulations (40 CFR Parts 122 and 403) to implementsection 3018(b) of the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act (RCRA) andsections 207(b) and 402(b)(8) of the Clean Water Act (CWA). The proposedregulations are intended to carry out the recommendations of the DomesticSewage Study (hereinafter referred to as ``the Study'').EPA submitted the Study to Congress in response to section 3018(a) of RCRA.This provision directed the Agency to prepare a report for Congress onwastes discharged through sewer systems to publicly owned treatment works(POTWs) that are exempt from regulation under RCRA as a result of the DomesticSewage Exclusion. The Study examined the nature and sources of hazardouswastes discharged to POTWs, measured the effectiveness of EPA's programsin dealing with such discharges, and recommended ways to improve the programsto better control hazardous wastes entering POTWs.To implement the recommendations to the Study, section 3018(b) of RCRAdirects the Administrator to revise existing regulations and promulgatesuch additional regulations as are necessary to assure the hazardous wastesdischarged to POTWs are adequately controlled to protect human health andthe environment. Today's proposed changes to the general pretreatment regulationsare a step towards that goal. POTWs should note that parts of today's proposalapply to all POTWs, whether or not they have an approved pretreatment program.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>DATE:</T2> Comments must be received on or before January 23, 1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ADDRESS:</T2> Comments should be addressed to Marilyn Goode, PermitsDivision (EN-336), Environmental Protection Agency, 401 M Street SW., WashingtonDC 20460.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT:</T2> Marilyn Goode, Permits Division(EN-336), Environmental Protection Agency, 401 M Street SW., Washington,DC 20460 (202-475-9533). The record for this rulemaking is available atRoom 208 Northeast Mall at the above address.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION</T2><ITAG tagnum="74">I. Background</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">II. Proposed Changes</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">A. Specific Discharge Prohibitions</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1. Ignitability and Explosivity</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">2. Reactivity and Fume Toxicity</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">3. Used Oil</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">4. Solvent Wastes</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">B. Spills and Batch Discharges (slugs)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">C. Trucked and Hauled Wastes</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">D. Notification Requirements</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">E. Individual Control Mechanisms for Industrial Users</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">F. Implementating the General Prohibitions Against Pass Through andInterference</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1. Water Quality-Based Permit Limits</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">2. Sludge Control</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">3. Toxicity-Based Permit Limits</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">4. Control of Indirect Dischargers: Alternative Approaches</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">5. Other Problems at POTWs</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">G. Enforcement of Categorical Standards</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1. Revisions to Local Limits</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">2. Inspections and Samplings of Significant Industrial Users by POTWs</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">3. Enforcement Response Plans for POTWs</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">4. Definition of Significant Violation</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">5. Reporting Requirements for Significant Industrial Users</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">H. Miscellaneous Amendments</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1. Local Limits Development and Enforcement</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">2. EPA and State Enforcement Action</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">3. National Pretreatment Standards: Categorical Standards</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">4. POTW Pretreatment Program Requirements: Implementation</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">5. Development and Submission of NPDES State Pretreatment Programs</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">6. Administrative Penalties Against Industrial Users</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">7. Provisions Governing Fraud and False Statements</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">III. Executive Order 12291</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">IV. Regulatory Flexibility Analysis</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">V. Paperwork Reduction Act</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">I. Background</ITAG>The regulatory amendments proposed today originated in the Domestic SewageExclusion. The exclusion, established by Congress in section 1004(27) ofRCRA, provides that solid or dissolved material in domestic sewage is notsolid waste as defined in RCRA. A corollary is that such material cannotbe considered a hazardous waste for purposes of RCRA.The regulatory exclusion applies to domestic sewage as well as mixturesof domestic sewage and other wastes that pass through the sewer systemto a POTW (see 40 CFR 261.4(a)(1)). The exclusion thus covers industrialwastes discharged to POTW sewers which contain domestic sewage, even ifthese wastes would be considered hazardous if disposed of by other means.One effect of the exclusion is that industrial facilities which generatehazardous wastes and discharge such wastes to sewers containing domesticsewage are not subject to RCRA manifest requirements for the transportof those excluded wastes. However, such industrial users must comply withcertain other RCRA requirements that apply to generators of hazardous wastes.Some of these requirements are set forth at 40 CFR 262.11 (determiningwhether a waste is hazardous), andSection; 262.12 (obtaining an EPA identificationnumber), andSection; 262.34 (accumulation of hazardous wastes), andSection;262.40 (c) and (d) (recordkeeping), and andSection; 262.43 (reporting). Otherrequirements may apply if the wastes are treated or stored prior to discharge.Another effect of the Domestic Sewage Exclusion is that POTWs receivingmixtures of hazardous waste and domestic sewage through the sewer systemare not deemed to have received hazardous wastes. Therefore, such POTWsare not required to meet the RCRA requirements of 40 CFR Part 264 for treating,storing, and disposing of these wastes. However, hazardous wastes delivereddirectly to a POTW by truck, rail, or dedicated pipe are not covered bythe Domestic Sewage Exclusion. POTWs receiving these wastes are subjectto regulation under the RCRA permit-by-rule (see 40 CFR 270.60(c)).In 1984, Congress enacted the Hazardous and Solid Waste Amendments to RCRA.The legislative history of these amendments demonstrates that Congresswanted EPA to examine the effects of the Domestic Sewage Exclusion. Tothis end, section 3018(a) of the Hazardous and Solid Waste Amendments toRCRA required EPA to prepare:<ITAG tagnum="21">* * * a report to Congress concerning those substances identifiedor listed under section 3001 which are not regulated under this subtitleby reason of the exclusion for mixtures of domestic sewage and other wastesthat pass through a sewer system to a publicly owned treatment works. Suchreport shall include the types, size, and number of generators which disposeof substances in this manner, and the identification of significant generators,wastes, and waste constituents not regulated under existing Federal lawor regulated in a manner sufficient to protect human health and the environment.</ITAG>EPA submitted its report (the Study) to Congress on February 7, 1986. Inperforming the study, the Agency reviewed information on 160,000 wastedischargers from 47 industrial categories and the residential sector. Becauseof the nature of the available data sources, the Study provided estimatesfor the discharge of the specific constituents of hazardous wastes (e.g.,benzene, acetone, etc.) rather than estimates for hazardous wastes as theyare more generally defined under RCRA (i.e., ``characteristic'' wastessuch as ignitable or reactive wastes, or listed wastes such as spent solvents,electroplating baths, etc.). The Study also provided more extensive estimatesfor those hazardous constituents which are also CWA priority pollutants.The CWA priority pollutant list was originally developed as part of a settlementagreement between the Natural Resouces Defense Council (NRDC) and EPA (<T3>NRDC v. Train, 8 ERC 2120 </T3>(D.D.C. 1976)). This agreement requiredthe agency to promulgate technology-based standards for 65 compounds orclasses of compounds. Congress then incorporated this list of toxic pollutantsas part of the 1977 amendments to the CWA. From the list of compounds orclasses of compounds, EPA later developed a list of 126 individual prioritypollutants.EPA was able to give estimates in the Study on the types, sources, andquantities of many hazardous constituents discharged to POTWs. The Studyprovided information on industrial categories ranging from large hazardouswaste generators (such as the organic chemicals industry) to the smallergenerators (such as laundries and motor vehicle services). The Study alsoexamined the fate of hazardous constituents once they are discharged toPOTW collection and treatment systems and discussed the potential for environmentaleffects resulting from the discharge of these constituents after treatmentby POTWs. The Study then measured the effectiveness of existing governmentcontrols in dealing with these discharges, particularly federal and localpretreatment programs and categorical pretreatment standards applicableto industrial users of POTWs.After considering all the pertinent data, EPA concluded that the DomesticSewage Exclusion should be retained at the present time. The Study foundthat CWA authorities are generally the best way to control hazardous wastedischarges to POTWs. However, the Study also found that these authoritiesshould be employed more broadly and effectively to regulate these discharges.The Study therefore recommended ways to improve various EPA programs underthe CWA to obtain better control of hazardous wastes entering POTWs.The legislative history of Section 3018 of RCRA displays Congress' understandingthat the appropriateness of the Domestic Sewage Exclusion depends largelyon an effective pretreatment program under the CWA. The pretreatment program(mandated by sections 307(b) and 402(b)(8) of the CWA and implemented in40 CFR Part 403) provides that industrial users must pretreat pollutantsdischarged to POTWs to prevent the pollutants from interfering with orpassing through POTWs. As a follow-up to the Domestic Sewage Study, section 3018(b) of RCRA requiresthe Administrator to revise existing regulations and to promulgate suchadditional regulations as are necessary to ensure that hazardous wastesdischarged to POTWs are adequately controlled to protect human health andthe environment. These regulations are to be promulgated pursuant to SubtitleC of RCRA or any other authority of the Administrator, including section307 of the CWA. As a first step towards promulgating the regulations calledfor by section 3018(b), the Agency published an Advance Notice of ProposedRulemaking (ANPR) in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>on August 22, 1986 (51 FR 30166). In the ANPR,EPA made preliminary suggestions for regulatory changes, which, if promulgated,would improve the control of hazardous wastes discharged to POTWs. Secondly,the Agency also held three public meetings in Washington, DC, Chicago,and San Francisco to solicit additional comments on the ANPR. Finally,EPA met with several interested groups and organizations to obtain thebenefit of their advice and expertise. The comments received on the ANPR were summarized and discussed in a <T4>Federal Register </T4>notice published on June 22, 1987 (52 FR 23477).That notice also described all the activities which EPA is carrying outto fulfill the recommendations of the Study. Most commenters suggestedways to make the pretreatment program more effective in controlling hazardouswastes discharged to municipal wastewater treatment plants. Today's notice proposes changes to the general pretreatment regulationsin response to the findings and recommendations of the Study (for a summaryof these findings and recommendations, see Chapter 7 of the Study). Today'sproposal reflects EPA's response to the Congressional mandate of section3018(b), its consideration of comments received on the ANPR, and its accumulatedexperience in shaping and overseeing the national pretreatment program.The amendments proposed today are more specific than the ideas presentedin earlier notices. Consequently, commenters may wish to supplement earliercomments. The Agency solicits comments on all aspects of the amendmentsproposed today. <ITAG tagnum="84">II. Proposed Changes </ITAG>A. Specific Discharge Prohibitions As part of its review of the national pretreatment program, the Study recommendedmodifying the prohibited discharge standards of the general pretreatmentregulations to improve control of characteristic hazardous wastes and solvents.The specific prohibitions forbid discharging certain types of materialswhich harm POTW systems by creating fire hazards, causing corrosion, obstructingflow, or creating heat which inhibits biological activity (see 40 CFR 403.5(b)).The Study and the ANPR discussed expanding these prohibitions to forbidthe discharge of characteristic hazardous wastes under RCRA (i.e., wastesthat are defined as hazardous under 40 CFR Part 261, Subpart C if theypossess certain characteristics). These characteristics are ignitability,corrosivity, reactivity, and toxicity measured by the Extraction Procedure(EP) or Toxicity Characteristic Leaching Procedure (TCLP). The majority of commenters who discussed this suggestion said that a blanketprohibition of characteristic RCRA hazardous wastes to POTWs would be inappropriate.These commenters stated that materials exhibiting these characteristicsoften lose their hazardous qualities when they are mixed with domesticsewage or treated at a POTW. The fact that a particular substance exhibitsa RCRA hazardous waste characteristic does not necessarily indicate thelikelihood of pass through or interference, these commenters believed,especially in the case of toxicity (EP or TCLP). Other commenters supported adding these characteristics to the specificdischarge prohibitions. These commenters often advocated modifying thecharacteristics to make them more relevant to conditions in POTW collectionand treatment systems. After considering this issue, the Agency has concluded that adding allthe RCRA characteristics to the specific discharge prohibitions would notbe appropriate, since substances exhibiting these characteristics do notnecessarily pass through or interfere with POTW. However, EPA agrees withthe commenters who stated that the current prohibitions could be improvedby adopting into 40 CFR 403.5(b) certain RCRA characteristics in modifiedform. Following is a discussion of the Agency's proposed modifications.<ITAG tagnum="81">1. Ignitability and Explosivity </ITAG>The indirect discharge of ignitable materials has caused many documentedcases of explosions and fires in POTW collection systems. The severityof these incidents ranges from narrowly averted fires to actual explosionswhich have killed POTW workers and destroyed the collection system andsurrounding area. These fires and explosions often happen near the point of indirect discharge.Temperatures in the collection system which are above the ambient temperaturemay promote evaporation of ignitable wastes and lead to fires and explosions.In addition, collection systems are generally closed to the atmosphereexcept at certain points such as manhole lids or storm drains. Thus, ignitablewastes within the collection system continually evaporate into a relativelyfixed volume of air, readily forming vapors which cannot be dispersed tothe open atmosphere. Once these vapors are formed, the sources of ignition can include electricsparks from motors or generators, frictional heat, cigarettes, hot surfacessuch as a manhole lid heated by the sun, or chemical heat generated byreactions occurring at the point of discharge. Explosions in POTW systemscan damage the sewer, pumping stations, and (if the sewer caves in becauseof an explosion) roads and buildings above the sewer. POTW workers maysuffer injuries from the force of an explosion, from burns, or from smokeinhalation, thus interfering with effective operation of the system. Finally,all fires or explosions will to some extent hinder the operation of thePOTW by requiring the affected trunk line to be closed off during firefightingor later repairs. The present specific prohibitions already forbid the discharge to sewersof materials creating a fire or explosion hazard. However, this narrativeprovision lacks specificity; it does not give industrial users or POTWsspecific methods or limits to determine whether a wastewater dischargeviolates the prohibition. As a result, the prohibition has limited effectivenessas a preventive requirement. The standard is clearly violated only if thereis an actual fire or explosion in the sewer, if an industrial user violatesa local limit designed to implement 40 CFR 403.5 (a) and (b). The bestway to prevent the discharge of ignitable pollutants (or mixtures) is totest or monitor the discharge for the characteristics of ignitability orexlosivity. However, the current prohibition does not require any suchtesting or monitoring. To address this problem, the Agency is today proposing to amend 403.5(b)to forbid discharges with a closed cup flashpoint of less than 140 anddegrees;Fahrenheit (the RCRA standard for ignitable liquid waste under 40 CFR 261.21(a)(1)).A flashpoint is the minimum temperature at which vapor combustion willspread away from its source of ignition. Below this temperature, combustionof the vapor immediately above the liquid will either not occur at all,or will occur only at the point of ignition. Temperatures above this flashpointare needed for combustion to spread. Thus, a flashpoint limitation wouldensure that no discharge to a POTW will independently cause the propagationof self-sustained combustion.EPA chose the flashpoint of 140 degrees Fahrenheit as the RCRA standardfor liquid ignitable wastes because typical industrial wastes are capableof being subjected to this temperature during routine management (studiesindicated that this temperature can be reached in storage tanks duringhot weather.) Typical industrial wastewater temperatures are considerablybelow 140 degrees Fahrenheit. In addition, ambient temperatures are notlikely to meet or exceed this temperature, either at the point of dischargeor in the sewer. For this reason, the Agency believes that the 140 degreeflashpoint would also be an appropriate addition to the specific dischargeprohibitions.Although the 140 degree prohibition would be imposed upon wastewater dischargesand not wastewater constituents, comparing the flashpoints of typical organicwastewater constituents provides a rough guide to the stringency of theflashpoint prohibition. In general, wastewater discharges would have tobe at least as nonflammable as furfural or benzaldehyde to meet the flashpointprohibition. The prohibition would not permit the undiluted discharge ofvolatiles such as benzene or ethyl alcohol.The most appropriate way to test the flashpoint of wastewaters is a closedcup measure. The closed cup method most closely duplicates the collectionof vapor in closed spaces such as sewers. For this reason, the Agency isproposing to prohibit discharges with a closed cup flashpoint of less than140 degrees F. Closed cup testers are commonly used and are available fromlaboratory supply firms. The closed cup tests specified under RCRA andproposed to be required today are the Pensky-Martin closed cup tester andthe Setaflash closed cup tester, using standard test methods specifiedin 40 CFR 261.21(a)(1). Not all industrial users comply with the flashpointprohibition. In addition, EPS believes imposing a uniform criterion onindustrial users will find it necessary to use such testers. Many willbe able to determine the flashpoint of substances they discharge by usingreference tables or other sources of information.The Agency emphasizes that the proposed flashpoint prohibition appliesto each industrial user's discharge independently. The prohibition willnot necessarily address the flammability of discharges from multiple industrialusers that are combined in sewers. Because of the effect of dilution inthe sewer system, however, it seems reasonable to assume that the concentratrionsof combustible constituents in sewer wastewaters will usually be well belowthe concentrations required for flammability if all industrial dischargeswould make POTW implementation and enforcement easier in some cases, sincethe flashpoint prohibition effectively prohibits the discharge of certainhighly flammable substances in pure or concentrated form. For these substances,enforcement of the specific prohibition would be particularly easy becauseof the availability in technical literature of values for pure compounds.EPA solicits comments on whether its proposed flashpoint prohibition isreasonable, unduly stringent, or insufficiently protective of POTWs underworst case conditions. Specifically, the Agency requests comments on whethersuch a prohibition would sufficiently take into account the effects (harmfulor beneficial) of effluent mixing or dilution in a POTW system, and onwhether there exists another technically feasible alternative that wouldtake these effects into account while still being preventive.It should be noted that an aqueous solution containing less than twenty-fourpercent alcohol by volume is not considered to be an ignitable waste under40 CFR 261.21(a)(1). Because these substances may be discharged to POTW'sin considerable quantities and they may wish to conduct appropriate monitoring,EPA is not proposing to exempt these liquids from its proposed prohibitionof the discharge of pollutants with a flashpoint of less than 140 anddegrees;Fahrenheit. However, the Agency solicits comment on whether the possibilityof damage to POTWs from such substances is so slight that such an exemptionwould be appropriate.In order to deal with the problems of mixing and dilution in the sewer,EPA evaluated various other prohibitions which would take these factorsinto account. The most practical option appears to be one which is alreadyused by some POTWs. This is a prohibition based on the lower explosionlimit (LEL) of an organic vapor mixture. The LEL of an organic vapor isthe minimum concentration required to form a flammable or explosive vaporto air mixture. Under this procedure, the POTW measures the flammabilityor explosivity of an organic vapor in the sewer as a percent of the mixture'sLEL, using an explosimeter. The POTW then identifies and quantifies (throughvapor phase monitoring) the specific compounds responsible for an LEL exceedanceregistered on the explosimeter. The POTW may subsequently require certainindustrial users to install gas monitoring equipment as appropriate. ManyPOTW technicians already use explosimeters to detect combustible vaporsin sewers. In addition, many standard design requirements for oxygen activatedsludge plants use LEL warning systems to prevent explosions in the recycledoxygen gas in the reactors. The warning system triggers an automatic shutdownof oxygen addition to the plant at some organic content below the LEL,as well as a flushing of the organic oxygen mixture from the reactor.EPA is today proposing to amend 40 CFR 403.5(b) to provide that no dischargeto the POTW shall result in an exceedance of ten percent of the LEL atany point within the POTW (including, e.g., the collection system). TheAgency believes that this prohibition, used in combination with the flashpointapproach, could be very effective in preventing fires and explosions. Theflashpoint prohibition is less expensive and easier to execute, but itis applied to the effluent before mixing in the sewer. The LEL measurements,on the other hand, are more costly and difficult to perform but are moreeffective in determing the explosivity of effluent mixtures under actualconditions in the sewer.The effectiveness of either of these prohibitions depends largely on monitoring.The flashpoint test is perhaps more appropriate as an inexpensive way tomonitor smaller dischargers who might occasionally discharge ignitablewastes, and hazardous waste haulers. It is a simple test that quickly identifieshighly flammable substances and mixtures. LEL monitoring may be more usefulwhen applied to significant dischargers who frequently or routinely dischargethese substances, since large or frequent discharges would better justifythe installation of continuous explosivity monitoring equipment that warnswhen a specified percentage of the LEL is reached. POTWs may also requireindustrial users to take other measure to prevent violations of the LELprohibition, such as modifying their discharge practices. The Agency solicits comments on whether the LEL prohibition is practical,either alone or in combination with the flashpoint prohibition. Specifically,EPA requests comments on whether it might be too difficult to link an LELexceedance within the sewer system to discharges from specific industrialusers, or whether the vapor phase monitoring needed to determine the causesof the exceedance would be too difficult or expensive. The Agency alsorequests comment on whether the flashpoint appproach or the LEL approachwould be sufficient alone to prevent fires and explosions at POTWs. <ITAG tagnum="81">2. Reactivity and Fume Toxicity</ITAG>Wastes exhibiting the reactivity characteristic are regulated under RCRAbecause their extreme instability and tendency to react violently or explodemake them a hazard to human health and the environment at all stages ofwaste management. In general, RCRA defines as reactive any waste whichis an explosion hazard, generates harmful quantities of toxic gas or vaporwhen mixed with water, or reacts violently without detonation with waterto generate elevated pressures and/or heat. EPA chose to adopt a narrativestandard for reactive wastes because the varied effects and physical propertiesasssociated with these wastes are not easily quantifiable or measurableby standardized testing protocols. Many commenters on the ANPR were concerned about the health and safetyof workers at POTWs. There is no question that the generation of toxicgases and vapors can sometimes be dangerous to the safety and health ofthese workers, thus interfering with operations at the POTW and even endangeringhuman life. In addition, the local general population could also sufferif sufficient quantities of toxic gases and vapors are released from sewervents or aeration or containment basins. Gases and vapors may be caused by chemical reactions between constituentsof the industrial discharge and the receiving sewage, or microbial metabolism.In addition, some toxic gases can be generated as the result of suddendrops in pH. Besides generating toxic gases and vapors when mixed withsewage, industrial discharges may have sufficiently high concentrationof toxic gases and volatile liquids to cause toxic levels of gas or vaporto form above the wastewater even if the discharge is diluted by the sewage.Sewer workers (and, in one instance, nearby residents) have been killedby inhaling hydrogen sulfide gas formed by the reaction of spilled substanceswith organic material in sludge or other materials. Many of the existing specific discharge prohibitions will help preventharm to POTW workers. Such harm, besides clearly constituting interferencewith POTW operations, is a serious concern for workers and operators atPOTWs, as was expressed in the comments received in response to the ANPR.However EPA has never explicitly required POTWs to develop local limitsto prevent this kind of interference. To address this question, the Agencyis today proposing to amend 40 CFR 403.5(b) to provide that no dischargeto the POTW shall result in toxic gases, vapors, or fumes within the POTWin a quantity that may cause acute worker health and safety problems. EPAis also proposing to amend 40 CFR 403.5(c) to require POTWs to implementthis prohibiton by establishing numerical discharge limits or other controlswhere necessary based on existing human toxicity criteria or other information.Industrial users would then be liable for any violations of these limitsor controls. The American Conference of Government Industrial Hygienists (ACGIH) annuallypublishes a list of threshold limit values (TLVs) for numerous toxic inorganicand organic chemicals. The threshold limit values represent estimated chemicalconcentrations in air below which harmful health effects in exposed populationsare believed to be unlikely to occur. For each chemical listed, one ormore types of threshold limits are listed. The three types of thresholdlimits are: (1) A concentration on which nearly all workers may be exposedday after day without adverse effects; (2) a concentration to which workersmay be exposed continuously for a short period of time without sufferingirritation, chronic tissue damage, or drowsiness sufficient to impair self-rescueor work efficiency; and (3) a concentration that should not be exceededduring any part of the work day. If any one of these three threshold limitsis exceeded, a potential hazard from that substance is presumed to exist.Another approach used to control the health impacts of breathing volatileorganic compounds has been developed by the Metropolitan Sewer Districtof Cincinnati. This approach features the use of a vapor headspace gaschromatographic analysis of equilibrated industrial wastewater discharge(one volume of wastewater to one volume of air head space) at room temperature(24 anddegrees;C). The analysis procedure measures the total vapor spaceorganic concentration by calculating the total peak area of the chromatogramexpressed as parts per million (ppm) of equivalent hexane. It is not necessaryto identify individual peaks. A 300 ppm equivalent hexane concentrationwas selected as a pragmatic local limit to minimize exposure hazards, since,although sewer workers should always use appropriate breathing devices,the 300 ppm limit minimizes the risk from accidental exposures. It reducesthe likelihood that volatile organic levels in the sewer air space wouldexceed levels considered immediately dangerous to life and health. A limitations of the 300 ppm equivalent hexane limit is that it does notensure that the levels of individual volatiles will be below safe exposurelevels. However, it should prevent concentrations of total volatiles fromexceeding immediately dangerous levels, and would also eliminate many explosiveor flammable hazards (except for spills or illegal discharges). Monitoringis done by a laboratory test that can be run by many wastewater treatmentlaboratories. It should be noted that neither the Cincinnati approach nor the ACGIH criteriaare designed to protect workers against long-term health effects from possiblecarcinogens, mutagens, and teratogens. However, EPA believes that thisproposed amendment to the specific discharge prohibitions will help preventthe generation of quantities of toxic vapors at the POTW that are capableof causing acute health effects to POTW workers. In some cases the prohibitionscould even prevent harm to the general public as well. POTWs may use suchstandards as those employed by the ACGIH and the Metropolitan Sewer Districtof Cincinnati to establish local limits or other criteria they find appropriate.These limits should give POTWs an effective way to implement and enforcethe proposed prohibition. EPA solicits comments on the addition of this prohibition to the generalpretreatment regulations and on the feasibility of developing local limitsto other controls from human toxicity criteria or other information suchas those discussed above. The Agency requests comments on the practicalityof such a prohibition, on alternative regulatory ways to protect workerhealth and safety, and on whether worker health and safety is adequatelyprotected by the present general and specific discharge prohibitions. <ITAG tagnum="81">3. Used Oil</ITAG>EPA also solicits comment on amending 40 CFR 403.5(b) to prohibit the dischargeof used oil to POTWs. The Agency has become concerned about the possibilitythat the volume of used oil disposed of by this method is increasing tothe point of causing interference and pass through.``Used oil'' is generally any oil that has been refined from crude oil,used, and, as a result of such use, contaminated by physical or chemicalimpurities. Used oils include spent automotive lubricating oils, transmissionand brake fluid, spent industrial oils such as compressor, turbine, andbearing oils, hydraulic oils, metalworking, gear, electrical, and refrigeratoroils, railroad drainings, and spent industrial process oils.The likely increase in volume of used oil discharged to sewers is due toseveral factors, chief among them the Domestic Sewage Exclusion, the RCRAland ban, and lower prices for crude oil which make it no longer economicallyprofitable to store used oil. The Agency estimates that four to eight milliongallons of used oil per year are dumped into sewers. There are currentlyno specific prohibitions against disposing of used oil in sewers, althoughthe existing prohibitions forbid the discharge of pollutants which obstructflow at the POTW. Used oil is often stored in 500 gallon tanks and transportedin 3000 gallon tank trucks. Release of these volumes of oil has the potentialto interfere with operations at POTWs, particularly in the case of smallerplants.In addition, used oil can contain a variety of toxic or hazardous constituentssuch as PCBs, benzene, chromium, arsenic, cadmium, and lead. Examinationof the composition of used oil generated in the United States showed thataverage levels of twelve pollutants found in waste oil are above the reportablequantities established in 40 CFR 302.4(a) as hazardous levels of theseconstituents under the Superfund Program. EPA has also conducted a studyassessing the potential for pass through of these pollutants to surfacewaters and to sludge. Results showed that, when large volumes of used oilare discharged, there is a potential for pass through that can cause violationsof water quality criteria (details of these analyses are contained in therecord of this rulemaking). Many of the constituents in contaminated usedoil, such as trichloroethylene and tetrachloroethylene, are highly watersoluble and thus characterized by a high mobility potential. Metals suchas arsenic, chromium, and lead are very persistent in the environment whenreleased from the POTW in sludge or in wastewater effluent. Used oil isalso an energy resource that might be better collected and recycled thandischarged into POTWs.For these reasons, the Agency requests comment on the possibility of amending40 CFR 403.5(b) to forbid the discharge of used oil into POTWs. EPA solicitscomments on the possible advantage and disadvantages of such a prohibition,and on which particular kinds of used oil should be prohibited.<ITAG tagnum="81">4. Solvent Wastes</ITAG>EPA also wishes to solicit comment on the possibility of amending the specificdischarge prohibitions to prohibit the discharge of listed solvent hazardouswastes from non-specific sources as defined in 40 CFR 261.31 (EPA HazardousWaste Nos. F001, F002, F003, F004, and F005).These solvent listings (about 30 organic compounds) encompass spent solvents,spent solvent mixtures and still bottoms from the recovery of spent solventsand spent solvent mixtures. The compounds were listed on the basis of ignitabilityand/or toxicity. Less than one-half are currently designated as CWA prioritypollutants.Discharges of solvent wastes to POTWs have involved actual fires or explosions,or potential fires which caused evacuation of treatment plant buildingsand unusual measures to protect treatment or collection systems (e.g.,ventilation or flushing of sewer lines). The most frequent problem causedby solvent discharges is fume toxicity occasioned by volatilization inPOTW collection and treatment systems. Many incidents have been documentedinvolving worker illness, including nausea, shortness of breath, skin irritation,and headaches. Solvent discharges have also caused inhibition or upsetof biological treatment systems in several instances, or interfered withtreatment plant operation in some other way. For example, in one case,the diversion of oxygen from an activated sludge treatment system due tothe threat of fire or explosion resulted in a marked decrease in treatmentplant efficiency.In addition, the Agency has evidence that solvent discharges to POTWs mayinterfere with beneficial sludge management. Several sludges in samplingprograms have approached TCLP failure due to concentration of solventsin leachate. Analysis of pollutant fate within POTW systems has shown thatsignificant quantities of solvents pass through to receiving waters wherebiological treatment systems are not well acclimated to the pollutant inquestion. Moreover, pass through of solvent wastes will be substantiallygreater at POTWs operating at less than secondary treatment levels or experiencingmajor combined sewer overflow problems.EPA solicits comments on the merits of amending the specific dischargeprohibitions to forbid the discharge to POTWs of listed solvent wastesunder 40 CFR 261.31 (EPA Hazardous Wastes Nos. F001, F002, F003, F004,and F005). Specifically, the Agency requests comment on whether existinglocal limits, the proposed amendments to the specific discharge prohibitionsconcerning ignitability and fume toxicity, and the proposed solvent managementcomponent of industrial user spill and batch control plans (see Part II-Bbelow) would address most of the concerns discussed above, possibly makinga ban on solvents redundant. A possible advantage of these proposed amendmentsis that they would address the discharge of organic compounds not usedas solvents. This approach might be particularly useful in industries withsignificant loadings of non-volatile organic pollutants (e.g., pharmaceuticalmanufacturing, pesticides manufacturing, or other industries utilizingorganics production or formulation processes). On the other hand, the RCRAlisted solvent wastes include alcohols and ketones, which are very solublein water, are often difficult to treat by physical or chemical treatment,and may be best treated by biological degradation processes such as thoseused at POTWs. The Agency solicits comment on whether the possible impactsof solvents on POTWs and receiving waters would justify prohibiting thesewastes from being discharges to POTWs, and whether such a prohibition wouldbe appropriate for those highly water-soluble solvent wastes which aremore appropriately treated by degradation.B. Spills and Batch Discharges (Slugs) Spills and batch discharges present special challenges to POTWs. As documentedby data on incidents at POTWs, these discharges can cause many problemsat the treatment plant, including worker illness, actual or threatenedexplosion, biological upset or inhibition, toxic fumes, corrosion, andcontamination of sludge and receiving waters. A recent survey undertakenby the Association of Metropolitan Sewerage Agencies (AMSA) indicated thatspills to sewer systems were the most common source of hazardous wastesat the respondents' treatment plants. The current general pretreatment regulations do not address these problemscomprehensively. The principal pretreatment regulation concerning slugsis the requirement that all industrial users notify POTWs of slug loadsof pollutant discharges that, because of flow rate or concentration, willinterefere with the POTW (40 CFR 403.12(f)). On October 17, 1988 (53 FR40562) EPA expanded this requirement to include notification of slug loadsthat would violate any of the specific prohibitions of 40 CFR 403.5(b).In the ANPR, the Agency discussed the possibility of requiring POTWs toimpose on industrial users plans for prevention and follow-up control ofspills and batch discharges. Many commenters responded positively to thissuggestion, although POTWs often stated that they wished to have maximumflexibility to address the particular concerns of their localities. SomePOTWs submitted copies of their own control plans (such as ordinances,policies, and procedures). EPA has reviewed these plans and other ideasto determine which features might be suitable to include in a uniform nationalrequirement. Following is a summary of the most frequent provisions thatthe Agency has found in its review of POTW control methods. It should benoted that the review included mainly larger POTWs, who represent onlya small percentage of the approximately 1500 POTWs required to have localpretreatment programs. In controlling spills and batch discharges to sewer systems, many POTWsrely upon the legal authorities contained in their sewer use ordinanceor on conditions enforced through discharge permits issued to their industrialusers. In general, most POTWs have not developed ways to specifically regulatebatch discharges to the sewer. Batch discharges of industrial process wastewatersare usually regulated by the same ordinances or permits as continuous discharges,and must meet the same local and federal discharge standards. They mayalso be regulated individually through permit requirements on notification,monitoring and reporting. However, since some batch discharges can harma sewer system, some POTWs do specifically regulate them, frequently byrequiring industrial users to obtain permission from the POTW before batchdischarges are allowed to take place. Many POTWs, however, have developed methods to help prevent and controlspills. The extent of regulation, and probably the effectiveness in controllingaccidental spills, varies considerably among POTWs. Controlling spillslarger depends on good faith efforts by the dischargers to carry out preventionand containment measures and to notify the POTW. POTWs cannot entirelypredict or prevent accidental or intentional spills from happening, althoughthey can inspect industrial user facilities to ensure that controls arein place and properly maintained. Knowledge by the POTW of all its industrialusers and their potential for spills and batch discharges is essentialto the control of such problems. In addition, POTWs may also find it necessaryto undertake measures to detect whether a slug discharge has occurred andto respond to any damage caused by the discharge. The most common element of POTW control plans is a requirement that industrialusers notify the POTW of accidental spills that occur. This requirementmay be contained in the sewer use ordinance or exist as a permit requirement.Some requirements are generic and only require notification. Others requirea description and analysis of the spilled material and later notificationof remedial measures. Some POTWs have developed notification forms, andsome specify minimum reportable quantities or require notification onlyfrom significant industrial users. Almost all POTWs' plans require generally that industrial users preventspills from occurring. Some POTWs require the use of physical measures,such as building spill containment facilities (i.e., dikes or berms). OtherPOTWs require development of a spill prevention or materials managementprogram, such as toxic organic (including solvent) management plans, bestmanagement practices, and emergency response procedures. At least one POTWgives its dischargers a detailed spill prevention checklist which includessuch items as history of and potential for spills, materials managementprocedures, tests for safety of storage tanks, transfer and pumping stations,and procedures for loading. Some POTW require the industrial user to submitspill follow-up reports describing the response to the spill and the stepstaken to prevent a recurrence of the type of spill that occurred. After considering the comments received on the ANPR and evaluating variouscontrol plans submitted by many POTWs, EPA is today proposing to amend40 CFR 403.8(f)(2)(v) to provide that POTWs must evaluate each of its significantindustrial users to determine whether such users need a plan to preventand control slug discharges, i.e., discharges (including spills and batches)that could lead to a violation of any of the special prohibitions or otherwisecause problems at the POTW. This evaluation is proposed to be requiredat the same time that the POTW conducts inspection or sampling of a significantindustrial user (for a discussion of the inspection and sampling requirements,as well as the definition of ``significant industrial users'', see PartII-G below). Under this procedure, POTWs would use the opportunity of aninspection or sampling to examine the operational practices and physicalpremises of a significant industrial user to decide whether these warrantedthe development of a plan to handle and prevent accidential spills or non-routinebatch discharges. In deciding whether a significant industrial user should have a slug controland prevention plan, the two most important criteria are generally thequantity and types of toxic or hazardous material stored at the facilityand the potential for these materials to enter the sewer system. For example,if an industrial user stores quantities of chemicals warranting attention,but the facility has not floor drains, sump pumps, or other direct waysfor these materials to enter the sewer, then the POTW may decide to accordlow priority to that particular industrial user. If, on the other hand,toxic or hazardous materials are stored in a room with floor drains, thePOTW may wish to consider that industrial user to be in a higher risk category.Similarly, the POTW may wish to use a certain volume or concentration ofa stored chemical as a cut-off point for requiring a slug plan. Examplesof such cut-off points include the reportable quantities used in the Countyof Los Angeles' wastewater ordinance, and the reportable quantities establishedunder the Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and LiabilityAct (CERCLA) which are used as criteria by the Metropolitan Sewer Districtof Louisville and Jefferson County. Another factor which POTWs may wish to consider in deciding which significantindustrial users should have slug control plans is the extent to whichthe industrial user in question is already covered by a similar plan underRCRA. For example, generators of hazardous wastes who treat, store, ordispose of hazardous waste on-site are generally subject to the provisionsgoverning accumulation of hazardous wastes (see 40 CFR 262.34). These provisionsspecify such measures as container use and management, personnel training,and procedures for emergency response. Which measures are required underandSection; 264.34 generally depends on the amount of hazardous waste generatedand the amount of time such waste remains on-site. After evaluating thephysical premises of a significant industrial user and the practices andprocedures developed by that user in response to other statutory requirements,a POTW may decide that these measures are a substitute for some or allof the measures that would be required under a slug control plan. Similarly,those industrial users who transport hazardous wastes or who dispose ofsuch wastes by other means than the sewer system may be subject to themore stringent requirements of 40 CFR Part 264, such as general facilitystandards (including inspection requirements, personnel training, and locationstandards) prepardness and prevention (including facility design, requiredequipment, and arrangements with local authorities) and contingency andemergency procedures. If a significant industrial user is covered by sucha plan, the POTW may decide that such measures are an adequate substitutefor some or all of the elements required in a local slug prevention plan.The Agency is also proposing to amend andSection; 403.8(f)(2)(v) to providethat if the POTW decides that such a plan is warranted for a particularsignificant industrial user, the plan must contain, at a minimum, the followingelements: (1) Description of discharge practices, including non-routine batch discharges;(2) Description of stored chemicals;(3) Procedures for promptly notifying the POTW of slug discharges as definedunder andSection; 403.5(b), with procedures for follow-up written notificationwithin five days;(4) Any necessary procedures to prevent accidental spills, including maintenanceof storage areas, handling and transfer of materials, loading and unloadingoperations, and control of plant site run-off;(5) Any necessary measures for building any containment structures or equipment;(6) Any necessary measures for controlling toxic organics (including solvents);(7) Any necessary procedures and equipment for emergency response; and(8) Any necessary follow-up practices to limit the damage suffered by thetreatment plant or the environment and to prevent recurrence of the typeof spill that occurred.The Agency believes that today's proposal would help many industrial usersprevent and control harmful spills and batch discharges. EPA believes thatthe elements listed in today's proposal are the essential minimum requirementsfor uniform application in all approved local pretreatment programs. Sincethe proposal lists only the minimal elements of such plans, it should givePOTWs adequate flexibility to decide the details of notification, prevention,and response procedures. The Agency notes also that the definition of significantindustrial user proposed today allows POTWs to add or delete industrialusers from this category according to the potential for adverse impactsat the POTW. This flexibility will allow POTWs to select the most appropriatecandidates for such plans and to tailor the plans to meet conditions peculiarto their localities, a concern that was expressed by many commenters.EPA solicits comments on all aspects of these proposed amendments. Specifically,the Agency requests comment on whether EPA should impose specific spillor batch control requirements directly on industrial users. As mentionedabove, the changes to the general pretreatment regulations promulgatedon October 17, 1988 (53 FR 40562) would require all industrial users, includingthose not covered by categorical standards, to notify the POTW of any slugload discharge which violates any of the specific discharge prohibitions.An advantage of imposing specific requirements directly on all industrialusers is that discharges to all POTWs would be covered, not just the industrialusers in approved local programs. In addition, POTWs would be saved theadministrative burdens of evaluating and approving plans submitted by theirindustrial users. The Agency welcomes comments on whether these advantageswould outweigh the loss of the flexibility allowed to POTWs in today'sproposal.The Agency also requests comment on whether the control plans proposedto be required today should be limited to significant industrial usersas defined in proposed 40 CFR 403.3(u) (discussed in Part II-G of today'snotice), or expanded to cover all industrial users, or limited to othercategories such as industrial users who submit notification of the dischargeof hazardous wastes under proposed 40 CFR 403.12(p).In addition, EPA requests comment on possible duplication between the requirementsof 40 CFR 403.12(f) (notification of slug loads to the POTW), section 103(a)of the Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and LiabilityAct of 1980 (CERCLA), and section 304(b) of the Superfund Amendments andReauthorization Act of 1986 (SARA). Section 103(a) of CERCLA requires thatfacilities (including indirect dischargers to sewers) which release a hazardoussubstance in a quantity greater than or equal to its reportable quantity(RQ) must notify the National Response Center. Section 304(b) of SARA requiressuch releases to be reported to local and state emergency planning commissionsas well. Although section 101(10) of CERCLA provides an exemption fromthese notification requirements for ``federally permitted'' releases, includingdischarges to POTWs with approved pretreatment programs which are in compliancewith pretreatment standards (see 53 FR 27268, July 19, 1988), the exemptionwill not apply to slug discharges. This, if an industrial user dischargesa slug load of one of 721 CERCLA hazardous substances which is equal toor exceeds the CERCLA RQ for that substance, the industrial user dischargingsuch a slug must notify the National Response Center, the local emergencyplanning committee established pursuant to section 301(c) of SARA, anyState emergency planning committee for a State likely to be affected bythe discharge, and the local POTW.The Agency requests comment on whether these notification requirementsare duplicative and unduly burdensom, and if so, on how they could be improved.In the <T4>Federal Register</T4> notice of July 19, 1988 proposing the regulatorydefinition of federally permitted releases (53 FR 27268), EPA stated thatthe Administrator would consider establishing an administrative exemptionfrom CERCLA notification requirements if it appeared that certain releasespose no hazard or pose a hazard only rarely and under circumstances thatwould not likely result in any action being taken to respond to the hazard.At the present time, the Agency has no data indicating that slug dischargesequal or exceeding CERCLA RQs do not pose a hazard, or that action (otherthan the POTW's response) is unlikely to be taken to respond to such adischarge. Nevertheless, EPA solicits comment on the appropriateness ofproposing such an administrative exemption in the future. The Agency isparticularly interested in any technical data which might demonstrate whetherdischarges to POTWs of an RQ or more of any or all CERCLA hazardous substancespresent little danger of pass through or interference, or whether suchdischarges are most appropriately handled by the POTW even if such dangerexists.Alternatively, EPA solicits comment on the usefulness of exempting industrialusers from having to notify the POTW of those slug discharges for whichthey have submitted CERCLA notification. This might be especially appropriateif POTWs were included on the local emergency planning committees establshedunder section 301(c) of SARA.In order to help POTWs implement slug control requirements, the Agencyplans to issue a guidance manual for use in controlling and preventingaccidental spills and batch discharges. The manual will include suggestedmethods for spill prevention by industrial users and response by POTWs,as well as suggested ways to control batch discharges by pretreatment permitsand sewer use ordinances.C. Trucked and Hauled WastesMany commenters on the ANPR expressed concern about discharges from liquidwaste haulers. The Study recommended strengthening controls on these dischargers,and in June 1987 the Agency issued guidance to help POTWs control the dischargeof such wastes to their systems (<T3>Guidance Manual for the Identification of Hazardous Wastes Deliveredto Publicly Owned Treatment Works by Truck, Rail, or Dedicated Pipe</T3>).As a further response to the Study's recommendation, EPA had suggestedin the ANPR prohibiting the introduction of hazardous wastes to sewer systemby truck except at discharge points designated by the POTW.Many commenters responded positively to this suggestion. Many POTWs alreadyprohibit the introduction of any trucked wastes to the sewer except atdesignated discharge points (some ban only the introduction of non-septicwastes). In response to these comments, the Agency is today proposing toamend 40 CFR 403.5(b) to prohibit the introduction to POTWs of any truckedor hauled pollutants except at discharge points designated by the POTW.EPA emphasizes that discharging hazardous wastes at transfer stations ordischarge points (i.e., sewer manholes) without a RCRA permit would violateRCRA generator and transporter requirements under 40 CFR Parts 262 and263 and thus is already illegal. Therefore, the principal new legal effectof today's proposed amendment would be to prohibit the discharge of truckednon-hazardous wastes to POTWs except at designated discharge points. Practically,however, this proposed requirement would give POTWs better control of <T3>all </T3>wastes into their systems (including hazardous wastes) byencouraging them to designate certain discharge points that they couldmonitor and, if such monitoring showed that wastes were hazardous, to preventthe introduction of undesirable wastes into the sewer system.EPA solicits comments on the merits of this proposal. Specifically, theAgency requests comments on whether the proposed prohibited discharge standardis too extensive and should be limited to non-septic wastes only. EPA alsorequests comment on whether to require POTWs to develop and obtain approvalof additional procedures to deal with trucked or hauled wastes (such asmonitoring and sampling), or on whether to amend 40 CFR 403.8 to requirePOTWs to specify particular discharge sites. The Agency points out thattruckers or haulers of wastes to POTWs are industrial users within themeaning of 40 CFR 403.3 (g) and (h). As such, they are already subjectto the prohibited discharge standards (and the notification requirementsof 40 CFR 403.12, if they transport wastes for categorical discharges orif they discharge slug loads). In addition, approved local pretreatmentprograms must include inspection, surveillance and monitoring programsto ensure that all industrial users (including truckers and haulers) complywith the pretreatment requirements. POTWs must, in other words, includesome procedures (tests, manifests, reports, etc.) to obtain informationfrom transporters about their wastes before these wastes can be accepted.POTWs need not await amendment of the current pretreatment regulationsto begin enforcing these local provisions. However, EPA solicits commenton whether other procedures would be appropriate especially for truckedand hauled wastes, such as requiring POTWs to conduct analyses of truckedwastes so that hazardousness and compatibility of the wastes with POTWoperations could be determined.D. Notification RequirementsNotifying POTWs of hazardous waste discharges is essential to the controlof such wastes. Without workable notification requirements, any furtherattempt to control hazardous pollutants is difficult if not impossible.Section 3010(a) of RCRA requires that any person who generates or transportsa RCRA hazardous waste, or who owns or operates a facility for the treatment,storage, or disposal of such waste, must file a notification with EPA orwith a State with an authorized hazardous waste permit program. Section3018(d) of RCRA (enacted as part of the Hazardous and Solid Waste amendmentsin 1984) clarifies that wastes mixed with domestic sewage are also subjectto this notification requirement.EPA has not yet promulgated regulations to implement the section 3018(d)notification requirements. The Study recommended that these requirementsbe implemented to ensure that regulatory authorities were aware of dischargesof hazardous wastes to POTWs. In the ANPR, the Agency suggested amendingthe general pretreatment regulations to require that industrial users notifyPOTWs (rather than EPA or the State) of any hazardous wastes discharged.Commenters expressed very strong support for the notification requirementsdiscussed in the ANPR. Many POTWs stated that such notification was essentialto give owners and operators of treatment plants notice of hazardous wastesentering their treatment and collection systems. Some commenters urgednotification of State permitting authorities as well. One commenter statedthat industrial users should be required to notify EPA of such discharges,because section 3018(d) required it and because such notification wouldgive the Agency more information about the sources and quantities of hazardouswastes entering POTWs, which would generally improve EPA oversight of localpretreatment programs.EPA is today proposing to amend 40 CFR 403.12 to add a new paragraph (p)to require that all industrial users notify EPA Regional Waste ManagementDivision Directors, State hazardous waste permitting authorities, and theirPOTW of any discharge into the POTW of a substance which is a listed orcharacteristic waste under section 3001 of RCRA. Such notification mustinclude a description of any such wastes discharged, specifying the volumeand concentration of the wastes, the type of discharge (continuous, batch,or other) and identifying the hazardous constituents contained in the listedwastes. The notification must also include an estimate of the volume ofhazardous wastes expected to be discharged during the following twelvemonths. The notification must take place within six months of the effectivedate of today's proposed amendments.Small quantity generators would be exempt from these notification requirementsduring any calendar month in which they generate no more than one hundredkilograms of hazardous wastes, except for certain acute hazardous wastesunder 40 CFR 261.5 (e), (f), (g), and (j). Generation of more than onehundred kilograms of hazardous waste in any given month would render thisexemption moot and would require one-time submission of the notification.Subsequent months during which the industrial user generated more thanone hundred kilograms per month would not require submission of additionalnotifications, except for the above-mentioned acute hazardous wastes.In the case of new regulations under section 3001 identifying additionalcharacteristics of hazardous waste or listing any additional substanceas a hazardous waste, the industrial user must notify the POTW of the dischargeof such substances within ninety days of the effective date of such regulations(except for the small quantity generator exemption discussed above).Under the amendments proposed today, these are one-time notification requirementswhich do not apply to pollutants already reported under the self/monitoringprovisions of 40 CFR 403.12 (b), (d), and (e), nor to pollutants alreadyreported under the ``changed discharge'' requirements of 40 CFR 403.12(j).However, to clarify that andSection; 403.12(j) also applies to the dischargeof hazardous wastes, the Agency is today proposing to amend that provisionto provide that all industrial users shall promptly notify the POTW inadvance of any substantial change in the volume or character of pollutantsin their discharge, including changes in the volume or character of anylisted or characteristic hazardous wastes for which the industrial userhas submitted initial notification under proposed andSection; 403.12(p).To ensure further control of hazardous wastes discharged to sewers, proposedandSection; 403.12(p) would require all industrial users who submit notificationof the discharge of hazardous wastes to certify that they have a programin place to reduce the volume and toxicity of non-categorical hazardouswastes generated to the degree they have determined to be economicallypracticable, and that they have selected the method of treatment, storage,or disposal currently available which minimizes the present and futurethreat to human health and the environment. It should be noted that a similarcertification requirement already applies to all generators of hazardouswastes under section 3002(b) of RCRA.Even though section 3010 mandates only a one-time notification, it hasbeen suggested that requiring industrial users to submit notification ofall hazardous waste discharges would burden POTWs, EPA, and States withpaperwork even where the quantity of wastes discharged was very small.To address these concerns, EPA has proposed the exemption from the notificationrequirements of those facilities that generate no more than 100 kilogramsof hazardous waste per calendar month. Under 40 CFR 261.5(c), these generatorsare exempt from most RCRA requirements, including the notification requirementsof section 3010, during a calendar month in which they generate no morethan 100 kilograms of hazardous waste (not including certain acutely hazardouswastes). This exemption, if promulgated, would be consistent with RCRAprogram requirements and might save POTWs and industrial users the timeand expense associated with notifications of small amounts of hazardouswastes. On the other hand, the exemption might allow the generation anddischarge into sewers of up to 100 kilograms per month of hazardous wasteswithout notification, an exemption which some POTWs (particularly smallerones) might not regard as justified.Similarly, EPA solicits comment on whether any of the existing RCRA formsmight be suitable for submission of the proposed notification requirements.The Agency also notes that certain industrial users (those with over tenemployees who discharge certain listed toxic chemicals) are required undersection 313 of SARA to complete annually a Toxics Release Inventory Form(EPA Form R) and submit this form to EPA and the State where the industrialuser is located. EPA requests comment on whether those industrial usersrequired to submit Form R should send a copy of Form R to the POTW in lieuof today's proposed hazardous waste notification requirements, if the toxicchemicals reported by the industrial user on Form R include those RCRAhazardous wastes for which notification would be required under today'sproposal. The Agency also requests comment on whether additional (or morespecific) management requirements should be required to control wastesfor which notification would be submitted under this proposal.E. Individual Control Mechanisms for Industrial UsersAs a way to carry out local pretreatment programs and implement local limitsmore effectively, the Agency discussed in the ANPR the possibility of requiringPOTWs to use a permit system as the basis of their pretreatment programs.In responding to this suggestion, some commenters opposed such a requirement,stating that the quality of local controls for industrial users shouldbe evaluated individually. Other commenters believed that such a programwas essential for consistent and enforceable requirements. A few industrycommenters believed that a permit system would result in better noticeof the duties required of industrial users.Audits conducted of local pretreatment programs have led EPA to questionwhether many exisitng control mechanisms are adequate to ensure compliancewith applicable pretreatment requirements. To address this concern, andafter evaluating ANPR comments on this subject, the Agency is today proposingto amend andSection; 403.8(f) to require that POTWs with approved programsmust have the legal authority to issue individual discharge permits orequivalent control mechanisms to industrial users identified as significantunder proposed 40 CFR 403.3(u) (this definition is discussed below in PartII-G). Such control mechanisms shall contain, at a minimum, the following:(1) Statement of duration (in no case more than five years); (2) Statement of non-transferability without prior POTW approval;(3) Applicable effluent limits based on categorical standards and locallimits;(4) Applicable monitoring, sampling, and reporting requirements; (5) Notification requirements for slug discharges as defined in andSection;403.5(b); and(6) Statement of applicable civil and criminal penalties for violationof pretreatment standards and requirements.EPA believes that individual control mechanisms are the best way to ensurecompliance with applicable pretreatment standards and requirements by significantindustrial users. A permit system will give the industrial user clear noticeof all the pretreatment requirements to which it is subject under bothfederal regulations and local program provisions. Such a system shouldmake it easier for such users to perform effective pretreatment measuresbefore a violation can occur, rather than after. The Agency solicits commentson the merits of this proposed amendment. Specifically, EPA requests commentson: (1) The appropriateness of limiting the requirement to industrial usersdefined as significant under proposed 40 CFR 403.3(s), or of additionalor alternative targets, such as categorical users or notifiers of hazardouswaste discharges under proposed andSection; 403.12(p); (2) whether the requirementshould apply only to POTWs with more than a specified number of industrialusers (and, if so, what number would be appropriate as a cut-off point);and (3) whether the list of permit conditions proposed today should becontracted, expanded, or modified. F. Implementing the General Prohibitions Against Pass Through and InterferenceThe Study and the ANPP discussed three principal ways to enhance implementationof the general discharge prohibitions against pass through and interference.These three ways were: (1) Requiring that water quality-based permit limitsfor additional constituents of hazardous wastes be incorporated into NPDESpermits issued to POTWs; (2) moving aggressively to set toxicity-basedlimits in NPDES Permits issued to POTWs; and (3) requiring POTWs to developlocal limits for problem pollutants even if no POTW permit violation occursor is threatened.The Agency received many comments about the relative virtues and drawbacksof the various ways to control pass through and interference. These commentsare discussed below. Also included is a discussion of forthcoming sludgecontrol requirements that should result in improved local limits to preventinterference.<ITAG tagnum="81">1. </ITAG>Water Quality-Based Permit LimitsThe most favored method of preventing pass through was incorporating morewater quality-based limits in permits issued to POTWs. POTWs could thenuse these permit limits to back-calculate local limits to prevent passthrough or interference.The Agency believes that the requirements of section 304(l) of the CWA,as amended, and EPA's ongoing toxics control program will result in anincrease in the numbers of water quality-based limits in NPDES permitsissued to POTWs. The provisions of section 304(1) require a progressiveprogram of toxic pollutant control. Under this section, States must developseveral lists of impaired waters, including waters where technology-basedcontrols and existing water quality-based controls are not adequate tomeet water quality standards for the priority pollutants or adequate toprotect designated uses.To further provide for the improvement of water quality, section 304(l)requires the development of individual control strategies for waterbodieswhich are impaired substantially or entirely due to point source discharges(including POTWs) of section 307(a) toxic pollutants. Under this provision,States must identify (within two years of enactment of the amendments)waters that are unlikely to comply with water quality standards after implementationof technology-based requirements. States must then identify particularpoint sources (including POTWs) that may be causing the violation of standardsin those waters and develop individual control strategies to reduce toxicsand meet standards in such waters not later than three years after thestrategy is established. Section 304(1) directs immediate attention to establishing controls wherethere are known impacts due entirely or substantially to point source dischargesof section 307(a) toxic pollutants. The Agency has prepared draft finalguidance for States and EPA Regions on how to address these problems withinthe available control mechanisms and data. The guidance also directs Statesand EPA Regions to address all known sources of toxicity in receiving waters(including hazardous constituents) as required by sections 301(b)(1)(C),303(c), 303(d), 303(e), 401, and 402(a), of the CWA. EPA regards the newstatutory requirements to control point sources as part of the ongoingnational program for toxics control. Initially, all known problems dueto any pollutant are to be controlled (using both new and existing statutoryauthorities) as soon as possible, even if the problem does not involvesection 307(a) pollutants.As stated above, most commenters on the ANPR believed that increasing theuse of water quality-based limits in NPDES permits issued to POTWs is thebest way to help POTWs develop local limits to control the pass throughof toxic and hazardous pollutants. The Agency believes that the individualcontrol strategies mandated by the CWA amendments and the ongoing nationaltoxics control program will increase the number of such permit limits,which POTWs can use to derive the necessary local limits.<ITAG tagnum="81">2. Sludge Control</ITAG> Another provision of the amended CWA has far-reaching implications forthe development of local limits. These are the provisions dealing withthe regulation of sewage sludge. The amendments set forth a comprehensiveprogram for reducing environmental risks and maximizing the beneficialuses of sludge. The amendments mandate the promulgation of technical criteriafor toxic pollutants in sweage sludge and the specification of acceptablesludge management practices, and require that these standards be implementedthrough permits. To carry out these requirements, EPA is currently developingacceptable contaminant levels and management practices for an initial groupof toxic pollutants for the five major sludge use and disposal options:Land application, distribution and marketing, incineration, landfilling,and ocean disposal (although not all pollutants will be regulated for eachoption).In addition to calling for the promulgation of technical criteria for theuse and disposal of sewage sludge, the 1987 amendments to section 405 alsocontain a significant departure from previous statutory provisions regardingimplementation. The amendment applies the requirements to all persons andfurther requires that the above technical criteria and management practicesbe included in an NPDES permit unless such criteria have been includedin a permit issued by one of several other listed federal permit programsor an approved State program. This means that, for the first time, permitswill be the required way to implement the federal technical criteria. Whenthe sludge criteria are promulgated, NPEDES permits issued to POTWs orother treatment works treating domestic sewage must include these requirementsunless they are included in another appropriate permit. These requirementscan be used by POTWs to calculate the local limits necessary to allow forthe widest range of sludge use and disposal options.Section 405 as amended also requires that, before promulgation of the criteria,the Administrator shall impose conditions in permits issued to POTWs undersection 402 or to take such other measures as the Administrator deems appropriateto protect public health and the environment from adverse effects whichmay occur from toxic pollutants in sewage sludge. To incorporate sludgelimits into permits before promulgation of such criteria, such limits willhave to be developed on a case-by-case basis. To implement this requirement,the Agency is preparing guidance for EPA Regions and States. The guidancewill set forth all existing federal and State requirements, and will recommendsludge contamination limits and management practices based on current EPAand State requirements. These limits and practices can also be used byPOTWs to begin developing the appropriate local limits.<ITAG tagnum="81">3. Toxicity-Based Permit Limits</ITAG>Commenters on the ANPR also expressed general support for the use of toxicity-basedlimits in NPDES permits issued to POTWs, although some commenters wereconcerned about the technical difficulties involved in setting permit limitsin response to such testing. As a supplement to limits based on numericalstandards for specific chemicals, the Agency has strongly encouraged NPDESpermitting authorities to establish toxicity testing requirements in municipalpermits and to develop whole effluent toxicity-based permit limitationsas appropriate to control toxicity to aquatic life. It should also be notedthat the expanded use of biomonitoring was one of the principal recommendationsof the Study. EPA has encouraged this approach to controlling toxic effluentsfor several reasons. First, it allows POTWS and permit writers to assesscertain toxic effects (such as lethality, growth, and reproductive success)of a complex mixture by integrating the interactions of the constituentsinto a single measure. Second, toxicity-based permit limits provide a numerictarget for measuring violations of the narrative standard ``No toxics dischargedin toxic amounts''. This approach allows the investigation of the causeof toxicity through toxicity reduction evaluations (TREs). A TRE is a studywhich uses toxicity tests to find ways to reduce or control effluent toxicity.Such tests can be used in a TRE to find the specific toxicant or toxicantscausing effluent toxicity and to identify a treatment which reduces oreliminates unacceptable toxic effects. Toxicity-based permit limits canalso be particularly useful where national categorical pretreatment standardsdo not adquately address local toxicity problems and/or where there areno numerical criteria currently available, as is the case for most toxicand hazardous constituents.In encouraging the use of toxicity testing, the Agency has recommendedthat testing requirements be based on the technical recommendations inthe <T3>Technical Support Document for Water Quality-Based Toxics Control,</T3>hereafter the ``TSD'' (EPA 440/4-85-032, September, 1985). This documentdescribes the rationale for whole effluent toxicity controls and the actionto be taken to access receiving water effects. It recommends a series oftoxicity screening tests based on effluent dilution. Permit writers canuse the results of the screening tests to determine if additional testingrequirements, local limits, and/or toxicity limits in the permit shouldbe established.Because EPA believes that toxicity evaluation is an essential step towardsdeveloping sound NPDES permit limits and local limits to control toxicand hazardous pollutants, the Agency is today proposing to amend 40 CFR122.21(j) to require that <T3>all</T3> existing POTWs conduct whole effluent toxicity screening and/ordefinitive toxocity testing and submit the results of such screening ortesting as part of their NPDES permit applications. The Agency anticipatesthat permits writers will use the toxicity screening information generatedfor the permit application to justify permit limitations and toxicity reductionevaluations when the testing reveals water quality standards violations.The toxicity information will also form the basis for monitoring requirementsand other permit conditions, when appropriate, to ensure ongoing compliancewith water quality standards.The screening which the Agency is proposing to require is adapted fromthe TSD because this document is in wide use and has proved to be a usefultool for conducting such protocols. First, an initial dilution screen shouldbe performed. The POTW should compare the flow rate of its receiving stream(in terms of the design low flow specified by the State) to its effluentdesign flow rate. For marine, estuarine, and standing water discharge situations,dilution can be calculated using existing State standards and correspondingallowable dilution calculation procedures.If dilution exceeds 10,000 to 1, and there is a reasonable rapid mix ofthe effluent outside of the initial dilution area in the receiving water,the effluent need not be tested further. If dilution is less than 10,000to 1, <T3>or</T3> mixing is not rapid and toxicity within a plume is of concern,then toxicity screening tests are proposed to be required as follows:(1) In cases where dilution is between 1,000 to 1 and 10,000 1, <T3>or</T3> where a poorly mixed effluent plume in a large receiving wateris of concern (even with greater dilution), acute toxicity screening testsmust be performed by collecting six effluent samples in one day (grab orshort-term composite) each quarter over a one-year period. Twenty-fourhour screening tests must then be conducted in 100% final effluent, usingan invertebrate species and a fish species in each sample, and followingthe protocols specified in <T3>Methods for Measuring the Acute Toxicity of Effluents to Aquatic Organisms,</T3>Peltier, W. and C.I. Weber, 3rd edition, 1985, EPA 600/4-85-013. The Director(i.e., the Regional Administrator or the State NPDES Director) may requirealternative tests procedures and may require the submission of definitivetesting data, generated according to procedures specified by the Director,to replace or supplement the screening test data specified above.(2) If dilution is less than 1,000 to 1 but greater than 100 to 1, chronictoxicity screening tests must be performed by collecting six samples (24-hourcomposite) on six successive days each quarter over a one-year period.Seven-day static screening tests must then be conducted in 100% final effluent,using an invertebrate species and a fish species, daily composite samplesto renew test solutions, and following protocols specified by the Director.The Director may require alternative test procedures and may require thesubmission of definitive testing data, generated according to proceduresspecified by the Director, to replace or supplement the screening testdata specified above.(3) If dilution is less than 100 to 1, screening is in appropriate, sinceat these ambient concentrations even minimally toxic effects can causeunacceptable toxicity. Instead, definitive toxicity data generation shallbe performed according to procedures required by the Director.Today's proposal would require the results of any acute or chronic toxicityscreening or testing performed above to be submitted to the Director aspart of the POTW's NPDES permit renewal application. The current regulations(andSection; 122.21(d)(1)) require that existing POTWs must submit permitrenewal applications at least 180 days before the currently effective permitexpires. The Director may grant permission to submit the application ata later date (but not later than the expiration date of the existing permit).Therefore, any screening or testing required under the above proceduresshould be commenced in time to be completed before the 180-day deadline. To address States with screening and testing procedures that are equivalentto those proposed above, the agency is also proposing to allow the POTWto use such equivalent procedures if they are accepted by the Director.However, the Agency solicits comment on other definitive data generationprocedures that would be appropriate for inclusion in NPDES permit applications,and on whether follow-up corrective measures to reduce toxicity shouldbe specified in 40 CFR Part 122. For example, POTWs might be required tofollow the recommendations of the TSD on definitive data generation, usinguncertainty factors and dilution data. Where the effluent is shown to havetoxic impact (as defined in the TSD trigger mechanism), corrective actioncould be required.  An alternative method of collecting definitive toxicity data might be torequire POTWs with high dilution ratios (1000 to 1 or greater) to conductacute tests on three species quarterly for the year preceding submissionof the permit application, while POTWs with low dilution ratios (less than1000 to one) might be required to conduct chronic tests on three speciesquarterly. Still another option is requiring POTWs with approved programsto conduct both acute and chronic toxicity tests on three species oncea month for a year before submission of the permit application, while allother POTWs might be required to conduct the same test but at a reducedfrequency, such as quarterly. Where the effect concentrations exceed theallowable dilution (as defined by the State standards) corrective measuresto reduce toxicity would be required.  Corrective measures to reduce toxicity include toxicity-based permit limits(which should in any event be required in case of a violation of Statewater quality standards), requiring further testing, or toxicity reductionevaluations (TREs). The Agency has recommended guidelines for making decisionsin the TSD. If the Director requires further testing to generate more definitivedata, the Agency has recommended several methods manuals for conductingsuch testing (see, e.g., the above-mentioned <T3>Methods for Measuring the Acute Toxicity of Effluents to Aquatic Organisms,</T3>Peltier, W., and C.I. Weber, 3rd edition, 1985, EPA Office of Researchand Development, Cincinnati, Ohio, EPA-600/4-85-013; <T3>Short</T3>-<T3>Term Methods for Estimating the Chronic Toxicity of Effluents and ReceivingWaters to Freshwater Organisms,</T3> Horning, W., and C.I. Weber, EPA Officeof Research and Development, Cincinnati, Ohio, EPA-600/4-85-014; <T3>Short</T3>-<T3>Term Methods for Estimating the Chronic Toxicity of Effluents and ReceivingWaters to Marine and Estuarine Organisms, </T3>Horning, W., and C.I. Weber.These methods, where properly followed, should give a valid assessmentof potential water quality impact.  As discussed above, TRE's may be necessary to bring a discharger into compliancewith a toxicity-based permit limit. A TRE is a study which employs toxicitytests and various types of treatment to identify specific ways to reduceeffluent toxicity. The effluent is subjected to typical laboratory techniquessuch as aeration, filtration, and fractionation. After each step, toxicitytests are conducted on altered and unaltered effluent. The toxicity isthen attributed to compounds removed or neutralized in that step at whichthe toxicity is significantly reduced. If a pollutant is identified asthe cause of the toxicity, it can be limited in the permit and then controlledthrough permit limits. If a treatment option (such as filatration) is shownas capable of reducing toxicity, the POTW can pursue that treatment tomeet its whole effluent toxicity requirements. A TRE can thus be used toset limits for specific toxicity-causing pollutants or to identify a treatmentwhich will reduce toxicity to the level required by a toxicity-based permitlimit. TREs can be conducted before permit issuance, under a permit complianceschedule, or in response to an administrative order. Protocols for conductingTRE's are currently available in draft from EPA's Office of Water Enforcementand Permits.  The Agency believes that these proposed requirements for detecting andcontrolling toxicity will help to achieve better control of toxic and hazardouswastes discharged from POTWs. The need to assess and control these pollutantsshould not be underestimated. EPA's proposal to require toxicity testingby POTWs is based upon evidence that these sources continue to dischargetoxic substances (including hazardous constituents) in significant amounts. The Agency emphasizes that whole effluent toxicity-based controls are acomplement to and not a substitute for chemical-specific controls. Neitherof these methods is by itself sufficient to control adverse toxic impactsin all cases. Permitting authorities also need the results of chemicaleffluent monitoring in order to develop effective permits for POTWs. Tothis end, the Agency plans to propose this year new application requirementsfor POTWs, along with a form to be used in submitting the application.This proposal will solicit comment on requiring POTWs to test their effluentfor (at a minimum) the CWA priority pollutants. The final application requirements,when promulgated, should incorporate requirements for both whole effluentand chemical-specific monitoring.  <ITAG tagnum="81">4. Control of Indirect Dischargers: Alternative Approaches  </ITAG>A. <T3>General issue.</T3> The amendments proposed in Parts A-E above willhelp POTWs address incidents that affect plant efficiency and should provideadditional assurance that POTWs can function properly and comply with theirpermits at all times. It should be noted that although the agency's concernin the amendments proposed today is primarily with hazardous and toxicpollutants, EPA encourages POTWs to adopt these mechanisms as necessaryto deal with any pollutant of local concern. In addition, EPA believesthat in some cases further measures are necessary to give POTWs adequatecontrol of wastes discharged to sewers. This belief was supported by commenterson the ANPR who expressed concern that existing local limits and categoricalstandards were not sufficient to deal expeditiously with harmful quantitiesof such wastes entering POTWs.  This concern is largely attributable to two causes: (1) The inherent limitationsof categorical standards and local limits developed to prevent violationsof NPDES permits issued to POTWs and (2) the likely increase in volumeof hazardous and toxic wastes discharged to POTWs. To address such environmentalconcerns and to respond adequately to the Congressional directive of section3018(b), the Agency has considered how best to exercise its broad authorityto control these discharges in a way that is effective, expeditious, andadministratively acceptable.  b. <T3>Nature and scope of environmental concern.</T3> The Study was expresslymandated by Congress to determine whether Clean Water Act programs couldcontrol the discharge of hazardous wastes to POTWs for adequate protectionof human health and the environment. Although the Study recommended retentionof the Domestic Sewage Exclusion, it also concluded that the level of manyhazardous constituents in POTW wastewaters (particularly organic compounds)raised concerns about potential effects on human health, the environment,and POTW operations. Even after full implementation of pretreatment standards,large amounts of hazardous, toxic, and carcinogenic chemicals are dischargedto POTWs. To illustrate the scope of the problem, the Study estimated that:andbullet; 7,260,000 pounds of hazardous metal constituents are dischargedto POTWs each year even after implementation of categorical pretreatmentstandards.andbullet; Between 81,400,000 and 132,000,000 pounds of priority hazardousorganic constituents are discharged to POTWs each year even after implementationof categorical pretreatment standards.andbullet; Approximately 138,600,000 pounds of nonpriority hazardous constituents(mostly organics) are discharged to POTWs each year, few of which are regulatedby categorical standards. The organics industries alone are estimated todischarge wastewater containing twice as many pounds of nonpriority organicconstituents as priority organic constituents.andbullet; For the indirect dischargers in the pharmaceutical manufacturingcategory, total cyanide is currently the only pollutant regulated undercategorical pretreatment standards. Yet significant loadings of hazardousconstituents are discharged by this industry, especially methanol, acetone,ethyl acetate, xylene, chloroform, methlyene chloride, and toluene.andbullet; Pesticide manufacturing is another significant discharger of hazardousconstituents to POTWs including benzene, chlorobenzene, and toluene.The Study expressed concern about the incomplete coverage of organics bycategorical standards (such as pharmaceuticals) and the fact that unregulatedor emerging industries are also likely to be significant sources of hazardouswaste discharges. These industries include hazardous waste treatment, solventand oil recovery, and service-oriented industries such as transportationsources that tend to discharge variable quantities of toxic pollutants.Some of the organics discharged from both categorical and noncategoricalindustries are subject to less than 50 percent removal at unacclimatedPOTWs. As a particular example of an expanding industry whose wastewatersare not specifically addressed by categorical standards, the Study citedhazardous waste treatment and disposal facilities and noted that almostall RCRA characteristic and listed wastes have been reported as potentiallypresent in discharges from these facilities.In addition, it should be noted that estimated loadings of hazardous constituentsfound in the Study from all industries are likely to be conservative. Lackof precise data on nonpriority constituents could easily mean that thefigures estimated by the Study are low, and as more research is done intothe effects of various toxic and hazardous pollutants, the list of pollutantsof concern may increase. More importantly, loadings of hazardous wastesto POTWs are almost certain to increase in the future due to the DomesticSewage Exclusion, the virtual ban under RCRA of liquid wastes in landfills,and the development of many new toxic chemicals every year. This likelyincrease argues for the need to take action to reduce these loadings.The Agency's concern about these massive loadings is heightened by thefact that some hazardous constituents are toxic in very low amounts. Forexample:andbullet; Cyanide is chronically toxic to freshwater aquatic organisms atconcentrations above 5.2 ug/1.andbullet; Benzene is chronically toxic to marine aquatic organisms in concentrationsabove 0.7 mg/1.andbullet; Silver is acutely toxic to freshwater aquatic organisms in concentrationsabove 4.1 ug/1.The Study devoted considerable effort to examining the potential effectson environmental media from hazardous constituents discharged to POTWs.Modeling techniques were used to project likely instream concentrationsof certain hazardous constituents, which were then compared to applicableaquatic and human health criteria and standards to determine potentialimpacts on surface water quality (full compliance with categorical pretreatmentstandards was assumed). The modeling techniques revealed that some projectedloadings of hazardous constituents exceeded water quality criteria evenafter imposition of categorical standards (pollutants of concern includedcadmium, silver, chromium, copper, mercury, lead, cyanide, and zinc). TheStudy also reviewed existing POTW bioassay results, which revealed thata significant number of POTWs had toxic discharges. The Study thereforeconcluded that the current categorical standards cannot by themselves resolvewater quality concerns, and projected that other hazardous constituentsmay also be passing through treatment systems to create water quality problems.Besides water quality concerns, the Study found that hazardous constituentsdischarged to POTWs can also enter the environment through other pathwayssuch as the disposal of sewage sludge contaminated with hazardous metalsor the volatilization of organic compounds contained in industrial discharges(these pollutants may be emited both to the ambient air and to the POTWworkplace).EPA believes that these findings firmly demonstrate the importance of expandingthe current exercise and the Agency's broad authority to address hazardouswastes discharged to POTWs.c. <T3>Current control mechanisms.</T3> To date, the Agency has exercisedits pretreatment authority primarily through categorical standards andlocal limits. Although these controls address many concerns, both havelimitations which prevent them from being a fully effective solution tothe problems presented by discharges of hazardous constituents.With respect to categorical standards, the Agency must collect and examineexhaustive data on the industries covered, including pollutants dischargedand treatment systems used. EPA is currently evaluating many regulatedand unregulated industries to determine which are appropriate candidatesfor new or revised categorical pretreatment standards. Developing thesestandards, is, however, a lengthy and expensive process, often taking manyyears.The second principal means of controlling hazardous waste discharges toPOTWs is the application of local limits. Local limits must be developedas needed to prevent interference with POTW operations and pass throughof pollutants to receiving waters.POTWs have generally developed adequate local limits to control interferencefrom and pass through of pollutants that were of most concern when thepretreatment program was first developed (i.e., metals and some priorityorganics), but these limits have sometimes not been effective in dealingwith the loadings of hazardous constituents for several reasons. First,calculating local limits for organics (such as many of the hazardous organicconstituents in the Study) can be technically difficult if numeric criteriafor these pollutants are not contained in POTWs' NPDES permits. Withoutsuch limits, it is impossible to establish pass through under the currentdefinition of that term at 40 CFR 403.3(n). Second, even when pass throughis demonstrated, the source of the toxicity can be difficult to locateif the pollutant concentration in a POTW's influent is highly variableand the matrix of pollutants contained in that influent is highly complex.Although EPA has issued guidance to POTWs on developing local limits, theselimits may need to be supplemented under certain circumstances.d. <T3>Commercial hazardous waste treaters: An industry of particular concern.</T3>The Agency's examination of the existing control mechanisms has ledit to conclude that even if additional categorical standards and improvedlocal limits were developed, there may still exist a gap in the abilityof the current pretreatment program to deal comprehensively with the concernsraised by the Study. Of particular concern is the aqueous waste treatmentand disposal industry. These facilities provide physical, chemical, and/orbiological treatment of hazardous and nonhazardous wastewaters, includingleachate from landfills and process wastewater from manufacturing operations.Aqueous treaters include both on-site generators that are not regulatedby categorical standards but treat process wastewater, and commercial hazardouswaste treaters (hereafter referred to as CWTs). Facilities that transportwastes to CWTs include landfills that choose not to provide treatment on-siteor do not have an acceptable receiving stream or sewer line available,and manufacturers who find it more cost-effective or otherwise preferableto contract haul their wastes to a commercial facility. The Agency estimatesthat there are now over one hundred CWTs in the country, most of whichdischarge to POTWs and many of which accept categorical wastes. Flow ratesat these facilities average about 45,000 gallons per day. The Study foundthat several incidents at POTWs have been associated with discharges fromCWTs. These events include disruption of treatment processes, hazardousfumes, and contamination of sewage sludge. The incidents are of concernin light of studies by EPA and the Association of Metropolitan SewerageAgencies (AMSA) showing that the number of waste treatment and disposalfacilities are increasing substantially. The AMSA survey indicated thatthe number of requests for connection to POTWs by these facilities maycause increasing problems at POTWs unless they are adequately controlled.Data collected recently by the Agency clearly indicate that the wastesaccepted by these facilities contain significant amounts of hazardous constituents(particularly organics) that pass through the CWT system, receiving inadequatetreatment before they are discharged to POTWs. Treatment provided at CWTsmay include treatment of specific waste types (for example, cyanide destruction),physical/chemical treatment, biological treatment, and tertiary treatment.Although the physical/chemical treatment technologies at some CWTs areprimarily designed to remove metals and other inorganic pollutants, thewastes accepted by these facilities contain significant amounts of organicsthat pass through the system, receiving limited treatment. This poor treatmentreceived by organics is reflected in the effluent levels of biochemicaloxygen demand (BOD), total organic carbon (TOC) and chemical oxygen demand(COD). Better reductions are achieved for heavy metals. Compared to physical/chemicaltreatment systems, the advanced treatment systems in place at some CWTsare more effective in removing organic compounds; however, high effluentconcentrations or organics are common even with advanced treatment suchas carbon adsorption. There are also high effluent concentrations of indicatorcompounds such as BOD, TOC, and COD, which demonstrates relatively poorremoval of organics.Organics found frequently and at high concentrations in the effluent fromCWTs include industrial solvents such as acetone, benezene, methylene chloride,and methyl ethyl ketone. These findings show that the physical/chemicaltechnologies, as currently operated by CWTs, are not removing organicsadequately and that the more advanced technologies are not producing asmuch removal as would be expected, perhaps because of poor design or lackof proper operation and maintenance. The findings demonstrate the clearpotential for discharge of poorly treated hazardous wastes to POTWs orsurface waters. In addition, comparison of raw wastewater samples fromCWTs with water quality criteria for acute and chronic toxicity, humanhealth, and drinking water revealed numerous exceedances for several categoriesof pollutants. It should also be noted that the Study estimated that thereis less than 50% removal of all four of the industrial solvents mentionedabove at unacclimated POTWs.CWTs are also difficult to regulate through traditional local limits. Thewaste discharged by many of these facilities is complex and varying inquality. Calculating local limits for CWTs can be technically difficultbecause of the variability of the influent to these facilities and theabsence of limits for many toxic and hazardous pollutants in NPDES permitsissued to POTWs.e. <T3>Options for addressing CWTs.</T3> To address the concerns presentedby CWTs, the Agency is considering three options for the regulation ofthese facilities. The first is the combined wastestream formula (by whichthey are currently covered), the second is categorical standards, and thethird is technology-based local limits, which will be explained in moredetail below.<ITAG tagnum="74">Combined Wastestream Formula</ITAG>In the absence of categorical standards specifically developed for CWTs,these facilities are now regulated by any other applicable categoricalstandards as applied using the combined wastestream formula. Industry hasbeen very vocal in criticizing the administrative difficulties of thisregulatory scheme. The formula is a mathematical method used to determineeffluent limits for CWTs receiving contributions from multiple wastestreams(both categorical and noncategorical). On June 12, 1986 (51 FR 21454) EPApublished a notice of proposed rulemaking which explained that this formulaapplies to ``centralized'' waste treaters (many of these facilities arelocated off-site and thus are equivalent to CWTs). EPA also proposed torequire that industrial contributors provide their centralized waste treaterswith information about the nature of their process, volume of wastes, pollutantconstituents, and any categorical pretreatment standards applicable tothe contributors' processes. This information is necessary for the centralizedwaste treater (or CWT) to apply the combined wastestream formula, and thusdetermine its effluent limits. The Agency solicited comments on whether other information is necessaryfor such an analysis and on whether the States should develop a form tostandardize the information provided to these facilities. EPA also solicitedcomments on several alternative regulatory schemes. These included promulgatingspecific categorical pretreatment standards for these facilities, relyingsolely on local limits, and controlling each pollutant discharged by thefacility by applying the most stringent numerical limit for that pollutanttaken from all the categorical standards applicable to the wastes receivedby the facility. EPA received many comments on this issue. Many industry commenters questionedthe feasibility of applying the combined wastestream formula to their facilities.They believed that the formula was too inflexible and that variabilityof incoming wastestreams to CWTs would require frequent recalculation ofthe formula, thus rendering limits out-of-date as soon as they were calculatedand leading to excessive administrative complexity. There would be littleroom for local discretion in controlling CWTs on a facility-specific basis.They also stated that the required information from their contributorsmight be difficult to obtain, update, or verify. Because of the comments and the practical issues they raised, EPA has decidednot to finalize the part of the June 12, 1986 proposal which addressedCWTs at this time. However, the options discussed in that notice are stillunder active consideration (in particular the combined wastestream formula).The Agency believes that some commenters have underestimated the flexibilityinherent in the formula (see 40 CFR 403.6(e)). If contributions to theCWT have a record of consistency and no change is projected, a single setof limitations would be developed and implemented. However, where the wastesintroduced to the CWT fluctuate, several alternative limitations couldbe developed corresponding to different waste configurations dischargedto the CWT and would be implemented according to which configuration currentlyprevailed. This approach would eliminate the burden of recalculating limitsto reflect changes in the CWT influent and would reduce the uncertaintyabout applicable limits. The principal step in implementing these alternative limits would be toobtain historical data from the CWT on its contributions at various timesover the calendar year. If the contributions remained consistent over aperiod of time (for example, if over a particular season the CWT receiveda relatively fixed percentage of wastes from mental finishers, anotherrelatively fixed percentage from coil coaters, and another from batterymanufacturers or copper formers) then limits could be calculated to takeeffect whenever these percentages changed. The alternative or consecutivelimits could be written into the permit or other agreement between thePOTW and the CWT.EPA requests comment on the feasibility of applying the combined wastestreamformula to CWTs, and on whether this approach would be more practical toimplement than the other options discussed today. Comments submitted concerningthe options discussed in the June 12, 1986 proposal need not be resubmitted;they will be incorporated as part of the rulemaking record.<ITAG tagnum="74">Categorical Standards</ITAG>The second principal option being considered by the Agency is the developmentof categorical standards specifically for CWTs. If a decision is made todevelop these standards, promulgation will probably take several years.It is for this reason that the Agency is proposing a third principal optionfor regulating CWTs, i.e., technology-based local limits. These limitscould serve as an interim measure before categorical standards are developed,or as a permanent measure if no standards are promulgated. They could alsobe used to reduce loadings of certain pollutants that are locally significantbut not nationally regulated.<ITAG tagnum="71">Local Limits Based on a Best Professional Judgment (BPJ) Determinationof Best Available Technology Economically Achievable (BAT)</ITAG>Section 307(b) directs the Administrator to establish pretreatment standards``to prevent the discharge of any pollutant through treatment works * ** which are publicly owned, which pollutant interferes with, passes through,or otherwise is incompatible with such works''. The legislative historyof this provision demonstrates Congress' belief that<ITAG tagnum="21">* * * comprehensive water pollution abatement requires that controlsshould * * * be extended to any industrial discharge into municipal wastetreatment works in order to prevent pollutants from entering such worksif they would impair the effectiveness of the waste treatment works, orif they would pass untreated or inadequately treated wastes through thetreatment works into navigable waters * * * [I]t is clear that the Administratormay be unable to establish such [pretreatment] standards for all pollutantswhich require such control. Therefore, the provisions of this section donot relieve municipalities and States from establishing pretreatment standardsto control rate, flows, and concentration of industrial discharges intowaste treatment works.</ITAG>(Report No. 92-414 of the Committee on Public Works of the U.S. Senate,2 Leg. History 1415, 1973).The legislative history also reveals that Congress intended wastes fromindirect dischargers to ultimately receive the same level of treatmentgiven to wastes from direct dischargers before these wastes enter navigablewaters. In discussing the 1977 amendments to the Federal Water PollutionControl Act, it was stated that<ITAG tagnum="21">* * * the combination of pretreatment and treatment by the municipaltreatment works shall achieve at least that treatment which would be requiredif the industrial user were making a direct discharge.</ITAG>(Joint Explanatory Statement of the Committee of Conference, 3 Leg. History271, 1978). In addition, there is no specific statutory language restricting the Agencyin fashioning a program to deal with the concerns that Congress was addressing.Rather, Congress provided EPA with the discretion to establish programrequirements that effectuate the goals of the pretreatment program.The Agency's current policy of basing local limits on the prevention ofPOTW NPDES permit violations was appropriate at the time the policy wasfirst established. However, this policy was not a full exercise of EPA'sstatutory authority. Instead, it was a prudent exercise of as much of thatauthority as was appropriate at the time. The following proposal is anincremental and essential change in the pretreatment program to improveits effectiveness and address problems revealed by the Study.EPA is today proposing to amend andSection;403.8 to require that POTWs withapproved programs receiving discharges from CWTs (as defined in proposedandSection;403.3(e)) develop and implement local limits based on a BPJ determinationof BAT. These case-by-case technology-based limits would be very similarto the BPJ limits which have been routinely developed by NPDES permit writersduring the past decade for direct dischargers not covered by national effluentlimitations guidelines.As noted above, POTWs must currently develop local limits to prevent passthrough under andSection; 403.3(n) (i.e., a discharge from an industrialuser that, alone or together with other sources, causes a violation ofthe POTW's NPDES permit). Since many of the pollutants discharged by CWTsare usually not restricted by NPDES permits issued to POTWs, EPA is alsoproposing a supplementary definition of pass through for POTWs receivingdischarges from CWTs. The proposed new definition would provide that passthrough means the failure of the CWT and the POTW to reduce pollutant dischargesfrom the POTW to the degree which would be required by section 301(b)(2)of the CWA if the CWT discharged directly to surface waters. To furtherthis requirement, the Agency is also proposing to amend andSection; 403.5(c)to provide that POTWs receiving discharges from CWTs must develop and enforcespecific local limits for these facilities to prevent pass through as definedin the proposed supplementary definition. It is probable that many POTWsalready have the legal authority to impose technology-based limits underlocal statutes or ordinances.(Note that today's proposal also would renumber andSection; 403.3(n), tobecome andSection; 403.3(o).)The proposed amendments require the POTW to determine whether the dischargefrom a CWT is receiving the level of effluent treatment which would berequired if the CWT were a direct discharger, after taking into accountthe treatment capability of the POTW. In order to determine what wouldconstitute best available technology for the CWT, the POTW could focuson pollutants regulated in the categorical standards for industries contributingto the CWT and any other pollutants of concern (priority or nonpriority)discharged by the CWT. The POTW should take into account all the factorsenumerated in section 304(b)(2)(A) of the CWA and 40 CFR 125.3(c)(2) thatare considered in developing BPJ limits for direct discharges. These includethe age of facilities and equipment processes employed, the engineeringaspects of various control technologies, and the costs of effluent reduction.For examples of what would constitute best available control technologiesfor various pollutants, the POTW may wish to consult effluent limitationsguidelines, or categorical standards for other industries (e.g., in themetal finishing category at 40 CFR Part 433, precipitation/clarificationfor metals, alkaline chlorination for cyanide, and hexavalent chromiumreduction; in the organics, plastics, and synthetic fibers category at40 CFR Part 414, steam stripping for organics). Alternatively, the POTWmay wish to conduct its own analysis. In addition, EPA plans to developtechnical information for use by POTWs in determining appropriate technology-basedtreatement. Based on the data available so far, the Agency has tentativelyconcluded that many CWTs may be able to meet BAT-based limits by betteroperation and maintenance, such as constructing additional storage tanks,piping and pumps for further waste segregation or collection for treatment.Such improvements may often be possible at relatively low cost (approximatelyfifty thousand dollars). Other CWTs may need to install more advanced treatmenttechnology which could be more expensive (up to five hundred thousand dollars,including operation and maintenance). POTWs may wish to conduct a carefulcase-by-case examination of the CWT in question to determine if adequatepollutant removal can be achieved by better operation and maintenance ratherthan by installation of additional technology.As mentioned above, the Agency encourages POTWs to adopt this mechanismas necessary to deal with pollutants of local concern as well as toxicand hazardous pollutants. After determining what would constitute bestavailable technology for the various pollutants discharged by the CWT,the POTW would determine whether the actual reduction achieved by the CWTplus the reduction achieved by the POTW were equal to the hypotheticalBAT limits. The most practical way to measure the POTW's removal for aspecific pollutant would be to employ EPA's removal credits protocals (see52 FR 42434 (November 5, 1987) and 46 FR 9404 (January 8, 1981)). Generallyspeaking, these protocals require twelve representative samples (of influentand effluent) to be taken over the course of a year, after which removalfor each sample is determined by measuring the difference as a percentageof the influent concentration. The POTW would be required to develop thepreviously calculated technology-based local limits for the CWT if thecombined removal by the CWT and the POTW for the pollutant in questionturned out to be less than that which would be required to meet such hypotheticalBAT limits. In order to keep the limits up to date, they should be evaluatedevery five years (see proposed andSection; 122.21(j)(2)).These technology-based local limits would be implemented and enforced inthe same manner as any other local limits. andSection; 403.8(f)(4) requiresPOTWs to develop local limits as required under andSection; 403.5(c)(1) (which,as proposed to be amended today, would require the development of technology-basedlocal limits for CWTs) or demonstrate that such local limits are not necessary.In the case of technology-based local limits, such a demonstration wouldnormally include a showing that the pollutants in the discharge from theCWT are reduced (after treatment by the CWT and the POTW) to the degreewhich would be required if the CWT were a direct discharger. Requirementsto develop and update such local limits as are necessary will be reflectedin the POTW's approved pretreatment program and incorporated into the POTW'spermit upon modification or reissuance (see proposed andSection; 403.8(f)(1)(iii)and existing andSection; 403.8(c). Like all other applicable pretreatmentrequirements, the failure to develop necessary local limits will continueto be subject to enforcement, either by EPA or an approved NPDES State,as a violation of the POTW's NPDES permit. However, the Agency notes thatunder most circumstances pass through as defined in proposed andSection;403.3(o)(2) would not be enforced in the absence of local limits specificallydeveloped to prevent such pass through.f. <T3>Other Industries. </T3>POTWs may also need to use their authority todevelop technology-based local limits for other industries. To this end,the Agency is considering requiring POTWs to develop such limits for pesticideand pharmaceutical manufacturers. The pharmaceutical industry ranks highin total hazardous constituent loadings for priority pollutants after theimplementation of categorical pretreatment standards, and the pesticideindustry has been among the nation's top ten dischargers of hazardous constituents.The Agency is currently reviewing pharmaceutical manufacturing to determinewhether to propose new categorical pretreatment standards for this industry,and it has already initiated rulemaking procedures which will lead to theeventual promulgation of standards for the pesticides industry. However,the Agency nevertheless believes that alternate controls may be necessary.g. <T3>Solicitation of Comments. </T3>EPA invites comment on which of theapproaches discussed today is the most practical and effective way to furtherthe recommendations of the Study by improving local limits. Specifically,EPA solicits comments on all aspects of the proposed requirement that POTWsdevelop local limits based on a BPJ determination of BAT, especially themerits of this approach compared to the combined wastestream formula. Theapproach might prove to be effective alternative to the formula and wouldaddress some of the concerns expressed by commenters responding to theJune 12, 1986 notice. In particular, POTWs would be able to address CWTson a case-by-case basis and develop limits that were tailored to the particularfacility. The Agency requests comment on whether POTWs should also be allowedto use the combined wastestream formula to develop local limits for thoseCWTs for which the formula might be more appropriate, i.e., those witha relatively invariable or predictable influent.The Agency also solicits comments on whether to require technology-basedlocal limits for pharmaceutical and pesticide manufacturers. In addition,EPA wishes to receive comments on the practical implementation aspectsof technology-based local limits for POTWs, whether for CWTs or industrialusers in general. The Agency plans to make technical information availablefor use in developing such limits, but welcomes comment on this issue andon whether any additional reporting or compliance requirements are necessaryfor these limits.EPA also solicits comments on whether to specify in the definition of passthrough under andSection; 403.3(o)(2) that such pass through is for purposesof local limits development only and is not subject to the general prohibitionof pass through in 40 CFR 403.5(a)(1) in the absence of local limits specificallydeveloped to prevent such pass through. The Agency requests comment onwhether such language is necessary or would be redundant in light of 40CFR 403.5(a)(2), which provides an affirmative defense for an industrialuser who demonstrates that it did not know or have reason to know thatits discharge caused pass through or interference.<ITAG tagnum="81">5. Other Problems at POTWs</ITAG>It should be noted that andSection; 403.3 defines interference as a discharge,which, alone or in conjunction with other sources, prevents the use ordisposal of sewage sludge in accordance with (among other authorities)the Clean Air Act (CAA). POTW sewage sludge incinerators are currentlyregulated under section 112 of the CAA (National Emissions Standards forHazardous Air Pollutants, or NESHAPS). EPA has promulgated emission ratesfor mercury and beryllium based on acceptable ambient concentrations, andthe Agency is considering other pollutants, including organics, for regulation.As further NESHAPS are promulgated, POTWs will be required to develop locallimits as necessary to ensure that their sludge incineration facilitiesmeet the emissions limits.With respect to air emissions from chemicals discharged to POTWs, EPA iscurrently studying the emission of volatile compounds and other toxic airpollutants from wastewater treatment plants (both direct and indirect dischargers).The emphasis is on emissions from the organic chemicals, plastic, and syntheticfibers industrial category and the pharmaceutical and pesticide manufacturingcategories. EPA is also developing test methods to identify other processwastestreams rich in volatile organic compounds. EPA is using data fromthis study to evaluate air emissions caused by volatilization formed fromthe treatment of wastewaters (by such means as air stripping) and is alsoconsidering possible regulation of such emissions under the Clean Air Act,which eventually reduce the amount of volatile compounds entering wastewatertreatment plants.EPA is also conducting a study to evaluate the extent of groundwater contaminationcaused by leaking sewers (see 52 FR 23485, June 22, 1987). If this studyindicates that such contamination is widespread, EPA will evaluate thepossibility of requiring POTWs to develop any local limits needed to preventviolation of any groundwater protection standards to which the POTW maybe subject.G. Enforcement of Categorical StandardsThe Study recommended that EPA pursue more stringent enforcement of categoricalpretreatment standards. More rigorous enforcement could lead to a significantreduction of pollutant loadings to POTWs, particularly of heavy metals.More stringent enforcement of the standards was also recommended by thePretreatment Implementation Review Task Force (PIRT) which in 1985 gavethe Agency recommendations for improving the national pretreatment program.The ANPR discussed several of EPA's initiatives to improve local enforcement,including guidance, audits and inspections of approved pretreatment programs,expanded self-monitoring requirements, and enforcement actions againstPOTWs with unimplemented programs.The commenters on the ANPR generally supported these means of improvingthe enforcement of categorical pretreatment standards. In response to thesecomments, EPA will continue to emphasize all activities designed to betterPOTWs' ability to enforce compliance with these standards.EPA is today proposing certain other changes to the general pretreatmentregulations which it believes will help POTWs enforce their local pretreatmentprograms and improve control of toxic and hazardous wastes discharged toPOTWs. These proposed changes are discussed below.<ITAG tagnum="81">1. Revisions to Local Limits</ITAG>On October 17, 1988 (53 FR 40562) EPA revised 40 CFR 403.8(f) by clarifyingthat the development of local limits (or a demonstration that they arenot necessary) is a prerequisite to approval of a POTW pretreatment programand the continuing legal acceptability of an approved program. Althoughthe regulatory language of that rule does not explicitly require POTWsto update local limits, the preamble of the June 12, 1986 proposal to thatrule stated that ``local limits * * * must be updated as necessary to reflectchanging conditions at the POTW'' (51 FR 21459) and that ``failure to ** * update, as needed, necessary local limits, will, of course, continueto be subject to enforcement, * * * as a violation of the POTW's permit''(51 FR 21460).In order to completely clarify this requirement, and because of the importanceof up-to-date local limits in controlling the discharges of toxic and hazardouspollutants, EPA is today proposing to add 40 CFR 122.21(j)(2) to providethat POTW's must evaluate in writing the need to update their local limitsas part of their NPDES permit applications (i.e., once every five yearsat a minimum). If the Director determines that a particular POTW shouldevaluate the need for revision more often, it may so specify in the POTWspermit or approved pretreatment program (as incorporated by reference inthe permit).Today's proposal would not require POTWs to update their local limits whensuch revision is not needed. Instead, EPA is proposing to establish a minimumfrequency for formal evaluation of the need for revised limits. Examplesof events that might indicate the need for such a revision include changesin the POTW's NPDES permit, changes in sludge disposal standards or POTWsludge disposal methods, modifications to the treatment plant, additionor deletion of significant industrial users, and changes in industrialusers' processes or pretreatment operations. These events could all affectthe likelihood of interference with POTW operations or possible lack ofcompliance with the POTW's NPDES permit. The proposed minimum frequencyshould give POTWs more precise notice of their legal responsibilities andshould help EPA enforce pretreatment implementation. The proposed frequencyshould also help POTWs be more effective in preventing pass through andinterference caused by the discharge of toxic and hazardous wastes.EPA solicits comment on whether POTWs should be required to conduct thisevaluation more frequently. For example, POTWs might be required to conductthe evaluation whenever multiple instances of pass through or interferencehad occurred (such as two or more violations in a quarter), in order todetermine whether existing local limits were adequate to prevent theseoccurrences or whether local enforcement efforts were adequate. POTWs mightalso be required to submit such evaluations once a year as part of theannual reports to the Approval Authority required under 40 CFR 403.8(i).The Agency welcomes comment on how frequently local limits should be examinedto ascertain whether they need to be revised.<ITAG tagnum="81">2. Inspections and Samplings of Significant Industrial Users by POTWs</ITAG>The existing regulations (40 CFR 403.8(f)(2)(v)) require that a POTW mustbe able to randomly sample and analyze the effluent from industrial usersand conduct surveillance and inspections to identify noncompliance withpretreatment standards. However, these regulations do no specifiy how oftenPOTWs must perform the sampling, analysis and surveillance.In the 1986<T3> Pretreatment Compliance Monitoring and Enforcement Guidance</T3> (hereinafter``1986 Guidance''), the Agency recommended that POTWs conduct at leastone inspection and/or sampling visit annually to all ``significant industrialusers.'' According to the Guidance, the term ``significant industrial user''includes all categorical users and any noncategorical industrial user thatdischarges 25,000 gallons per day or more of process wastewater, contributesa process wastestream which make up 5 percent or more of the average dryweather capacity of the treatment plant, or has a reasonable potential,in the opinion of the Control Authority, to adversely affect the POTW'soperation. The Control Authority, with the consent of the Approval Authority,may remove any noncategorical industrial user from the list of significantindustrial users if the industrial user has no reasonable potential toadversely affect the POTW or to violate any pretreatment standards or requirements.EPA is today proposing that the consent of the Approval Authority is notrequired when the industrial user would have been designated as significantonly because of an average process wastewater flow of 25,000 gallons perday or more. Noncategorical industrial users may also petition to be removedfrom the significant industrial user list. For example, if the significantnoncategorical industrial user has an exemplary compliance record, is notlikely to contribute to instances of interference, and has little potentialto contribute to any water quality problems, the POTW may wish to deletethat user from the list. Alternatively, EPA emphasized in the Guidancethat more frequent monitoring should probably be conducted in certain cases:e.g., if an industrial user has not been able to comply with pretreatmentstandards. POTWs may of course add an industrial user to the list evenif that user was previously deleted, if compliance problems of any othercircumstances arise which make such an addition appropriate.In order to specify a standard for how often POTWs must inspect and samplethe effluent of their significant industrial users, EPA is today proposingto modify 40 CFR 403.8(f)(2)(v) to require POTWs to inspect and sampleall ``significant industrial users'' at least once every two years. EPAbelieves that inspection and sampling of these users at least this oftenshould help POTWs avert pass through and interference by keeping bettertrack of the larger industrial discharges into their treatment and collectionsystems (especially discharges of toxic and hazardous pollutants). Theproposed amendments should also provide a uniform program requirement thatEPA can readily enforce if necessary.As discussed in Part II-B above, the Agency is also proposing to amendandSection; 403.8(f)(2)(v) to require POTWs to evaluate at the time of inspectionwhether the significant industrial user in question should have a slugcontrol plan for the prevention and control of spills or batch dischargesthat could cause interference at the POTW.To ensure that POTW s update their lists of significant industrial users,the Agency is also proposing to amend 40 CFR 403.12(i)(1) to require POTWsto identify such users in the updated list of all industrial users requiredto be submitted to the Approval Authority under 40 CFR 403.12(i). In addition,EPA is proposing to amend 40 CFR 403.8(f)(2)(iii) to require that, within30 days after a POTW's establishment or revision of its list of significantindustrial users, the POTW must inform all such newly designated usersof their status and the applicable requirements of this status.Because several of the proposals today affect requirements applicable tosignificant industrial users, EPA believes that it would be appropriateto propose a regulatory definition of this term for the sake of nationalconsistency and program enforceability. For this reason, EPA is proposingto amend 40 CFR 403.3 to add a new definition of ``significant industrialuser'' which is similar to the definition in the 1986 Guidance, since thatdefinition has so far proved to be a useful tool in distinguishing themore important indirect dischargers.EPA solicits comment on all of the rule changes proposed above. Specifically,the Agency requests comment on whether to require that pretreatment POTWssample and inspect all significant industrial users at least once a year,or whether the currently proposed frequency of at least once every twoyears will better enable the POTW to plan for inspections while still collectinguseful and current discharge information. Alternatively, EPA solicits commenton whether today's proposed requirement of a minimum sampling and inspectionfrequency is redundant in light of other existing or proposed requirementsfor self-monitoring and reporting by indirect dischargers, such as twice-yearlysampling and reporting by all categorical and significant non-categoricalindustrial users, requirements to report a substantial change in the volumeor character of pollutants discharged, and requirements to notify the POTWsof any discharge of hazardous wastes. The Agency also requests commenton whether to require that POTWs target certain compounds or classes ofcompounds in their sampling, such as the RCRA Appendix IX hazardous constituents.The Agency also solicits comment on the appropriateness of the proposeddefinition of significant industrial user, and on whether to allow POTWsto delete categorical users from the list of significant industrial users.It has been suggested that some categorical users do not present any potentialfor pass through or interference and that POTWs should therefore be freeto delete them from the list of significant industrial users. Similarly,EPA requests comment on whether the flow criterion of 25,000 gallons perday for non-categorical significant industrial users is appropriate. TheAgency has traditionally used the 25,000 gallons per day criterion in guidancedocuments. That number represents 5 percent of the hydraulic capacity ofthe smallest POTWs which EPA may require to have an approved pretreatmentprogram (i.e., those POTWs with half a million gallons per day of designflow capacity). However, EPA solicits comment on whether a larger flowcriterion (such as 50,000 gallons per day) would be more useful as a guidelinefor identifying those industrial users with the capacity for adverselyaffecting most POTWs.In addition, EPA wishes to receive comment on the role of the ApprovalAuthority in designating significant industrial users. Specifically, theAgency requests comment on whether the Control Authority should be requiredto obtain the agreement of the Approval Authority before choosing not todesignate (or removing from the list) an industrial user who would otherwisebe included because of the proposed criteria.The Agency also solicits comment on expanding the definition of significantindustrial user to include notifiers of hazardous waste discharges underproposed andSection; 403.12(p). Since inclusion in the definition may carrycertain administrative consequences for those notifiers in approved pretreatmentprograms (self-monitoring, inspections, individual control mechanisms,and slug control plans), the Agency welcomes comment on whether any orall of these requirements would be appropriate for some or all dischargersof hazardous wastes.In addition, the Agency solicits comment on the usefulness of requiringPOTWs to estimate, in the annual reports submitted to the Approval Authorityunder andSection; 403.8(i), whether the amount of hazardous wastes receivedduring the last calendar year has changed significantly and whether anychange has affected operations at the POTW.<ITAG tagnum="81">3. Enforcement Response Plans for POTWs</ITAG>The existing general pretreatment regulations do not clearly specify theenforcement requirements applicable to POTWs with approved pretreatmentprograms. The only specific enforcement sanction identified is the requirementthat POTWs publish the names of significant noncompliers in the largestlocal daily newspaper. The regulations require POTW program submissionsto identify how the POTW intends to ensure compliance; they also requirePOTWs to enforce all pretreatment standards and requirements against industrialusers and obtain remedies for noncompliance (40 CFR 403.8(f)(1)). However,POTWs are not informed specifically what their legal responsibilities arein carrying out enforcement actions. This also complicates EPA's task inenforcing this part of approved pretreatment programs, since evaluationof POTW enforcement is difficult when the procedures contained in the approvedprogram are not sufficiently specific.EPA Regions and NPDES States have Enforcement Management Systems in operationfor direct dischargers. In the 1986 Guidance, the Agency encouraged eachPOTW to develop an Enforcement Response Guide, which is a set of proceduresdescribing how the POTW will investigate industrial user violations andwhich corrective or enforcement actions the POTW will take to respond tosuch violations (the Guidance suggested certain procedures). To ensurethat POTWs develop and implement specific enforcement procedures, EPA isproposing today to amend 40 CFR 403.8(f) to require all POTWs with pretreatmentprograms to develop and implement an enforcement response plan describinghow the POTW will investigate and respond to instances of industrial usernoncompliance, including time frames within which the responses will takeplace.The Agency believes that the process of developing these plans will bevery valuable in helping POTWs decide what resources are needed to enforcetheir pretreatment standards and how they will actually deal with industrialuser violations. Such plans will also make it much easier for EPA to determinewhether a POTW is complying with its pretreatment implementation requirementsfor enforcement. The proposed rule will not interfere with the abilityof POTWs to carry out their programs in a manner suited to their needs,nor should such a plan be difficult to develop. The 1986 Guidance includeddetailed suggestions on various appropriate responses to many differentkinds of noncompliance. The POTW should use both the Guidance and its ownexpertise to develop a reasonable plan to address and remedy noncompliance.EPA solicits comments on this proposal. Specifically, the Agency requestscomments on whether to include more specific elements in the enforcementresponse plan. Although the Agency believes that the maximum degree offlexibility is needed for POTWs to address their particular problems, itis possible that certain elements of such plans might be suitable for uniformapplication. EPA welcomes comment on this issue.<ITAG tagnum="81">4. Definition of Significant Violation</ITAG>The existing regulations (40 CFR 403.8(f)(2)(vii)) require Control Authoritiesto publish, in the daily newspaper with the largest circulation in theservice community, a list of industrial users which had significant violationsof applicable pretreatment standards and requirements during the previoustwelve months. The list must be published at least once a year. ``Significantviolation'' is defined as a violation which remains uncorrected 45 daysafter notification of noncompliance; which is part of a pattern of noncomplianceover a twelve-month period; which involves a failure to accurately reportnoncompliance; or which resulted in the POTW exercising its emergency authorityunder 40 CFR 403.8(f)(1)(vi)(B).This definition paralleled the criteria for submitting Quarterly NoncomplianceReports (QNCRs) on direct dischargers. QNCRs are submitted by States withapproved NPDES programs or by EPA Regions for States without such programs.The Agency uses QNCRs to track the progress and measure the effectivenessof NPDES compliance and enforcement against direct dischargers. However,in 1985 EPA revised the criteria for the types of violations required tobe reported in QNCRs. The revisions, besides containing more precise language,established technical review criteria (TRC) to be used for reporting certaineffluent violations. The TRCs were based on the magnitude and/or durationof the violations.The 1986 Guidance included a detailed description of significant violationsby industrial users which substantially mirrored these new criteria forthe violations required to be reported in QNCRs. In the Guidance, EPA recommendedthe national use of this definition to identify the most serious violationsby industrial users and to set priorities for enforcement actions.Experience with the current definition of significant violation has shownthat POTWs vary considerably in their definition and application of thisinterpretation when selecting which violations to publish in local newspapers.This is particularly true of deciding what constitutes a ``pattern of noncompliance''under 40 CFR 403.8(f)(2)(vii). To eliminate these inconsistencies and toestablish more parity between the treatment of violations committed bydirect and indirect dischargers, the Agency is proposing today to amendandSection;403.8(f)(2)(vii) to replace the definition of significant violationwith a new definition which is substantially the same as the criteria forreporting direct discharger violations in QNCRs.Under the definition proposed today, a POTW must publish in the largestdaily newspaper a list of industrial users who were in significant violationin the previous twelve months. A violation would be significant if it metone or more of the following criteria:(1) Chronic violations of wastewater discharge limits, i.e., those in whichsixty-six percent or more of all of the measurements taken during a six-monthperiod exceed (by any magnitude) the daily maximum limit or the averagelimit for the same pollutant parameter;(2) Technical review criteria (TRC) violations, defined here as those inwhich thirty-three percent or more of all the measurements taken duringa six-month period equal or exceed the product of the daily average maximumlimit or the average limit times the applicable TRC (TRC = 1.4 for BOD,TSS, fats, oil and grease, and 1.2 for all other pollutants except pH);(3) Any other violation of a pretreatment effluent limit (daily maximumor longer term average) that the Control Authority believes has caused,alone or in combination with other discharges, interference or pass through(including endangering the health of POTW personnel or the general public);(4) Any discharge of a pollutant that has caused imminent danger to humanhealth, welfare, or to the environment and has resulted in the POTW's exerciseof its emergency authority under paragraph (f)(1)(iv)(B) to halt or preventsuch a discharge,(5) Violation, by ninety days or more after the schedule date, of a complianceschedule milestone, contained in a local control mechanism or enforcementorder, for starting construction, completing construction, or attainingfinal compliance;(6) Failure to provide required reports such as baseline monitoring reports,90-day compliance reports, periodic self-monitoring reports, and reportson compliance with compliance schedules within thirty days of the due date;(7) Failure to accurately report noncompliance, or(8) Any other violation or group of violations which the Control Authorityconsiders to be significant.The Agency believes that this proposed amendment gives POTWs more precisenotice of their obligation to establish which industrial user violationsmust be published. EPA solicits comments on the appropriateness of theabove criteria. The Agency emphasizes that industrial users would continueto be liable for any violation of applicable pretreatment requirements.Whether an industrial user is identified as being a significant violatordoes not determine the type of enforcement action that should be taken,including enforcement actions for lesser violations.<ITAG tagnum="81">5. Reporting Requirements for Significant Industrial Users</ITAG>40 CFR 403.12 describes the reports that industrial users who are subjectto categorical pretreatment standards must submit to their control authorities.The existing regulations do not specifically require non-categorical industrialusers to submit reports to the control authority regarding their compliancewith applicable pretreatment requirements. On October 17, 1988, (53 FR40562) EPA amended 40 CFR 403.12 to clarify that Control Authorities mustrequire appropriate reporting from those industrial users with dischargesnot subject to categorical standards.In order to ensure that this reporting is carried out regularly, the Agencyis today proposing to amend 40 CFR 403.12(h) to require that all significantindustrial users (as defined under proposed 40 CFR 403.3(u), includingnoncategorical significant users) must submit to their POTWs at least twicea year a description of the nature, concentration, and flow of pollutantsselected for such reporting by the POTW. In addition, EPA is proposingto require all significant industrial users to base their reports on dataobtained through appropriate sampling and analysis performed during theperiod covered by the report, which data is representative of conditionsoccurring during the reporting period. Control Authorities or ApprovalAuthorities may require more frequent monitoring or more detailed informationin the report as appropriate. As mentioned above, the Agency is also proposingto amend 40 CFR 403.8 to require POTWs to inform significant industrialusers of their status and the applicable requirements of this status.EPA believes that these proposed requirements will give POTWs much moreaccurate knowledge of non-categorical wastes entering their treatment andcollection systems. This knowledge is particularly important because manytoxic and hazardous pollutants are not covered by categorical standards.EAP also believes that establishing minimum monitoring frequencies is theonly way to ensure that the samples submitted to the POTW are representativeand up to date.The Agency solicits comment on this proposed change to the general pretreatmentregulations. Specifically, EAP requests comment on the twice-yearly reportingfrequency and on limiting the reporting requirements to significant industrialusers as defined in proposed 40 CFR 403.3(u). EPA selected the twice-yearlyfrequency to be consistent with similar requirements for categorical industrialusers, and has proposed to limit the requirements to significant noncategoricalindustrial users because these users seem likely to discharge the largestamounts of toxic and hazardous pollutants. In addition, the proposed definitionof significant industrial users gives POTWs flexibility to add or deleteindustrial users as appropriate. The Agency also requests comment on whetherto require significant industrial users to sample for certain compoundsor classes of compounds, such as the RCRA Appendix IX hazardous constituents.EPA welcomes comment on these and other aspects of this proposed requirement.H. Miscellaneous AmendmentsIn addition to the substantive regulatory changes proposed today, the Agencyis also proposing to amend some possibly confusing language in the generalpretreatment regulations to clarify current requirements and avoid misunderstandings.These proposed clarifications are discussed below.<ITAG tagnum="81">1. Local Limits Development and Enforcement</ITAG>40 CFR 403.5(c) provides that POTWs ``developing'' pretreatment programsmust develop and enforce specific limits to implement the general and specificdischarge prohibitions. In order to clarify that POTWs with already approvedpretreatment programs must also develop and enforce local limits, EPA istoday proposing to amend andSection; 403.5(c) to provide that POTWs shallcontinue to develop and enforce appropriate local limits after developingan approved pretreatment program.<ITAG tagnum="81">2. EPA and State Enforcement Action</ITAG>40 CFR 403.5(e) summarizes the statutory procedures that EPA and NPDESStates must follow under section 309(f) of the Clean Water Act to bringan enforcement action against an industrial user that has caused interferenceor pass through at a POTW, i.e., give the POTW 30 days notice to initiateits own enforcement action. However, andSection;403.5(e) may be misleadingin not stating that this notice requirement only applies to federal enforcementunder section 309(f) of the Act and not to other enforcement actions. Inorder to avoid misunderstanding, the Agency is today proposing to amendthe title of andSection;403.5(e) to indicate that these notice proceduresonly apply to actions brought under section 309(f) of the Act.<ITAG tagnum="81">3. National Pretreatment Standards: Categorical Standards</ITAG>40 CFR 403.6 provides that categorical pretreatment standards, unless specificallynoted otherwise, shall be in addition to the general prohibitions establishedin andSection;403.5. There appears to have been an omission from this provisionof the specific discharge prohibitions. In order to rectify this omission,the Agency is proposing to amend andSection;403.6 to add that national pretreatmentstandards, unless specifically noted otherwise, shall be in addition toall prohibitions and limits established under andSection;403.5(c).<ITAG tagnum="81">4. POTW Pretreatment Program Requirements: Implementation</ITAG>40 CFR 403.8(f) establishes the requirements that a POTW pretreatment programmust satisfy. Although these requirements must be met in order for a POTW'spretreatment program to be approved, the proposed regulatory language clarifiesthe implementation obligations for a POTW. The language of andSection;408.8(f)(1)now provides that a POTW must have the legal authority which enables itto deny, condition, and control pollutant contributions, require complianceby industrial users, conduct inspections of industrial users, and performother essential attributes of a pretreatment program. This language doesnot specifically state that POTWs must implement these procedures. In orderto clarify this language, the Agency is today proposing to amend the introductorysentence of andSection;403.8(f) to state that ``a POTW Pretreatment Programshall be developed <T3> and implemented</T3> to meet the following requirements''. EPA isalso proposing to amend the title of andSection;403.8 to read ``POTW PretreatmentPrograms: Development <T3> and Implementation</T3> by POTW'' [emphasis added].<ITAG tagnum="81">5. Development and Submission of NPDES State Pretreatment Programs</ITAG>40 CRFR 403.10(c) states that ``the EPA shall * * * apply and enforce PretreatmentStandards and Requirements until the necessary implementing action is takenby the State''. This sentence might give the wrong impression that theAgency will cease to enforce pretreatment requirements when a State hasreceived program approval. Since this is not the case, EPA is today proposingto delete this sentence from andSection;403.10.<ITAG tagnum="81">6. Admistrative Penalties Against Industrial Users</ITAG>The second to last sentence in 40 CFR andSection;403.8(f)(1)(vii)(B) statesthat ``the Approval Authority shall have authority to seek <T3>judicial</T3> relief for noncompliance by Industrial Users when thePOTW has acted to seek such relief but has sought a penalty which the ApprovalAuthority finds to be insufficient [emphasis added]''. Given EPA's newauthority under the 1987 amendments to the Clean Water Act to assess administrativepenalties, this provision is misleading because it could arguably be readto preclude the Agency from seeking such penalties from an industrial userthat has already been subject to an action by the POTW. In order to correctthis omission, the Agency is today proposing to amend andSection;403.8(f)(1)(vii)(B)to provide that the Approval Authority shall have the authority to seekjudicial relief and also may have administrative authority when the POTWhas acted to seek such relief but has sought a monetary penalty which theApproval Authority finds to be insufficient.<ITAG tagnum="81">7. Provisions Governing Fraud and False Statements</ITAG>40 CFR 403.12(n) regarding fraud and false statements incorrectly statesthat certain reporting requirements shall be subject to the provisionsof section 309(c)(2) of the Clean Water Act. The reference should be tosections 309(c)(4) and (6) of the Act, as amended. EPA is today amendingandSection;403.12(n) accordingly.<ITAG tagnum="84">III. Executive Order 12291</ITAG>Under Executive Order 12291, EPA must judge whether a regulation is ``Major''and therefore subject to the requirement of a Regulatory Impact Analysis.Major rules are those which impose a cost on the economy of $100 millionor more annually or have certain other economic impacts. The Agency hasdetermined that this proposed rule does not meet the criteria of a majorrule as set forth in section 1(b) of the Executive Order. The Agency hascompleted a general estimate of the annual cost to industrial users andPOTWs of the amendments proposed today, which is included in the administrativerecord for this rulemaking. This rule has been submitted to the Officeof Management and Budget (OMB) for review.<ITAG tagnum="84">IV. Regulatory Flexibility Analysis</ITAG>The Regulatory Flexibility Act, 5 U.S.C. 601 <T3>et seq.,</T3> requires EPA and other agencies to prepare an initialregulatory flexibility analysis for all proposed regulations that havea significant impact on a substantial number of small entities. No regulatoryflexibility analysis is required, however, where the head of the Agencycertifies that the rule will not have a significant economic impact ona substantial number of small entities. Most of the amendments proposedtoday, if promulgated, will affect larger POTWs (those with approved pretreatmentprograms) and significant industrial users. I hereby certify, pursuantto 5 U.S.C. 605(b), that this regulation will not have a significant impacton a substantial number of small entities.<ITAG tagnum="84">V. Paperwork Reduction Act</ITAG>In accordance with the Paperwork Reduction Act of 1980, 44 U.S.C. 3501<T3>et seq.,</T3> EPA must submit any rule that contains information collectionrequirements to the Director of OMB for review and approval. The informationcollection requirements in this proposed rule have been submitted to OMBfor review.<ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects</ITAG>40 CFR Part 122Administrative practice and procedure, Reporting and recordkeeping requirements,Water pollution control, Confidential business information.40 CFR Part 403Confidential business information, Reporting and recordkeeping requirements,Waste treatment and disposal, Water pollution control.<ITAG tagnum="21">Date: November 14, 1988.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Lee M. Thomas,</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Administrator.</ITAG>For the reasons explained in the preamble, Part, 122 and 403 of ChapterI of Title 40 of the Code of Federal Regulations are proposed to be amendedas follows:<ITAG tagnum="52">PART 122_NATIONAL POLLUTANT DISCHARGE ELIMINATION SYSTEM </ITAG>40 CFR Part 122 is amended as follows: 1. The authority citation for Part 122 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Clean Water Act, 33 U.S.C. 1251 <T3>et seq. </T3></ITAG>2. Section 122.21 is proposed to be amended by adding paragraphs (j) (1)and (2) to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 122.21 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Application for a permit.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(j) * * *(1) All existing POTWs shall provide the following information to the Director:(i) Results of whole effluent biological toxicity screening, conductedas follows: (A) For POTWs with a dilution ratio between the receiving stream low flowrate and the effluent design flow rate of less than 10,000 to 1 but greaterthan 1,000 to 1, or with a poorly mixed effluent plume in a receiving waterof concern: Collect six effluent samples in one day (grab or short-term composite)each quarter over a one-year period. Conduct twenty-four hour screeningtests for acute toxicity in 100% final effluent, using an invertebratespecies and a fish species in each sample, and following the protocolsspecified in <T3>Methods for Measuring the Acute Toxicity of Effluents to Aquatic Organisms,</T3>Peltier, W. and C.I. Weber, 3rd edition, 1985, EPA 600/4-85-013. TheDirector may require alternative test procedures and may require the submissionof definitive testing data, generated according to procedures specifiedby the Director, to replace or supplement the screening test data specifiedabove. (B) For POTWs with a dilution ratio between the receiving stream low flowrate and the effluent design flow rate of less than 1,000 to 1 but greaterthan 100 to 1: Collect six effluent samples (24-hour composite) on sixsuccessive days each quarter over a one-year period. Conduct seven-daystatic screening test for chronic toxicity in 100% final effluent, usingan invertebrate species and a fish species in each sample, daily compositesamples to renew test solutions, and following protocols specified by theDirector. The Director may require alternative test procedure and may requirethe submission of definitive testing data, generated according to proceduresspecified by the Director, to replace or supplement the screening testdata specified above. (c) For POTWs with a dilution ratio between the receiving stream low flowrate and the effluent design flow rate of less than 100 to 1, results ofdefinitive toxicity data generation according to procedures required bythe Director. (ii) [Reserved](2) All POTWs with approved pretreatment programs shall provide the followinginformation to the Director: A formal evaluation of the need to reviselocal limits under 40 CFR 403.5(c)(1). <ITAG tagnum="52">PART 403_GENERAL PRETREATMENT REGULATIONS FOR EXISTING AND NEW SOURCES</ITAG>1. The authority citation for Part 403 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Sec. 54(c)(2) of the Clean Water Act of 1977 (Pub.L. 95-217), secs. 204(b)(1)(C), 208(b)(2)(C)(iii), 301(b)(1)(A)(ii), 301(b)(2)(A)(ii),301(b)(2)(C), 301(h)(5), 301(i)(2), 304 (e) and (g), 307, 308, 309, 402(b),405 and 501(a) of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act (Pub. L. 92-500),as amended by the Clean Water Act of 1977 and the Water Quality Act of1987.</ITAG>2. Section 403.3 is proposed to be amended by redesignating existing paragraphs(e) through (s) and (t) as paragraphs (f) through (t) and (v), designatingnew paragraph (o) as paragraph (o)(1), and adding new paragraphs (e), (o)(2)and (u) as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 403.3 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(e) The term ``CWT'' means a commercial centralized waste treatment facility(other than a landfill or an incinerator) which treats or stores aqueouswastes generated by facilities not located on the site of the CWT and whichdisposes of these wastes by introducing them to a POTW.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(o)(2) In the case of POTWs receiving discharges from CWTs as defined inandSection; 403.3(e), pass through also means the failure of the CWT andthe POTW to reduce pollutant discharges from the POTW to the degree whichwould be required under section 301(b)(2) of the CWA if the CWT dischargeddirectly to surface waters. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(u) the term ``Significant Industrial User'' means:(1) All dischargers subject to Categorical Pretreatment standards underandSection; 403.6 and 40 CFR Chapter I, Subchapter N; and (2) All noncategorical dischargers that, in the opinion of the ControlAuthority, have a reasonable potential to adversely affect the POTW's operation,or that contribute a process wastestream which makes up 5 percent or moreof the average dry weather capacity of the POTW treatement plant, or thatdischarge an average of 25,000 gallons per day or more of process wastewaterto the POTW. However, the Control Authority need not designate as Significantany noncategorical Industrial User that, in the opinion of the ControlAuthority and with the agreement of the Approval Authority, has no potentialfor adversely affecting the POTW's operation or for violating any pretreatmentstandard or requirement. The agreement of the Approval Authority is notnecessary in cases where the noncategorical discharger would have beendesignated as significant only because of an average discharge of 25,000gallons per day or more of process wastewater. However, (3) Any noncategorical Industrial Use designated as Significant may petitionthe Control Authority to be deleted from the list of Significant IndustrialUsers on the grounds that it has no potential for adversely affecting thePOTW's operation or violating any pretreatment standard or requirement.3. Section 403.5 is proposed to be amended by revising paragraphs (b)(1),adding text to the end of (c)(1), revising the title of paragraph (e),and adding new paragraphs (b)(6) and (b)(7) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 403.5</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">National pretreatment standards: prohibited discharges.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(b) * * *(1) Pollutants which create a fire or explosion hazard in the POTW, including,but not limited to, pollutants with a closed cup flashpoint of less than140 degrees Farenheit (sixty degrees Centigrade), as determined by a Pensky-MartensClosed Cup Tester, using the test method specified in ATSM standard D-93-79or D-93-80k (incorporated by reference, see andSection; 260.11) or a SetaflashClosed Cup Tester, using the test method specified in ATSM Standard D-3278-78(incorporated by reference, see andSection; 260.11) and pollutants whichcause an exceedance of 10% of the lower explosive limit (LEL) at any pointwithin the POTW.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(6) Pollutants which result in the presence of toxic gases, vapors, orfumes within the POTW in a quantity that may cause acute workers healthand safety problems.(7) Any trucked or hauled pollutants, except at discharge points designatedby the POTW.(c) * * *(1) * * * Each POTW with an approved Pretreatment Program shall continueto develop these limits as necessary and effectively enforce such limits.Such POTWs shall implement the prohibition in paragraph (b)(6) of thissection by establishing numerical discharge limits or other controls wherenecessary based on existing human toxicity criteria or other information.Such POTWs receiving discharges from CWTs as defined in andSection; 403.3(e)shall develop and enforce specific limits for those facilities to preventpass through as defined in andSection; 403.3(o)(2).<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(e) <T3>EPA and Stated enforcement actions under section 309(f) of the  CWA.* * *</T3>4. andSection; 403.6 is proposed to be amended by revising the introductorytext to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;403.6</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">National Pretreatment Standards: Categorical Standards.</ITAG>National Pretreatment Standards specifying quantities or concentrationsof pollutants or pollutant properties which may be discharged to a POTWby existing or new Industrial Users in specific industrial subcategorieswill be established as separate regulations under the appropriate subpartof 40 CFR Chapter I, Subchapter N. These standards, unless specificallynoted otherwise, shall be in addition to all prohibitions and limits establishedunder andSection;403.5(c).<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>5. andSection; 403.8 is proposed to be amended by revising the Section heading,the introductory text paragraph (f), redesignating paragraphs (f)(1)(iii)through (f)(1)(vii) as (f)(1)(iv) through (f)(1) (viii), revising paragraphs(f)(1)(vii)(B), (f)(2)(v), and (f)(2)(vii), adding text to the end of (f)(1)(iv),and (f)(2)(iii), and adding new paragraphs (f)(1)(iii) and (f)(5) to readas follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 403.8</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Pretreatment Program Requirements: Development and Implementationby POTW.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(f) <T3>POTW pretreatment requirements. </T3>A POTW Pretreatment Program shallbe developed and implemented to meet the following requirements:(1) * * *(iii) Develop local limits for commercial aqueous off-site waste treaters(CWTs, as defined in andSection; 403.3(e)) based upon a best professionaljudgment (BPJ) determination of the best available technology economicallyachievable (BAT).(iv) * * * In the case of Industrial Users identified as significant underandSection; 403.3(u), this control shall be achieved through discharge permitsor equivalent individual control mechanisms issued to each such user. Suchpermits or other control mechanisms must contain, at a minimum, the followingconditions:(A) Statement of duration (in no case more than five years);(B) Statement of non-transferability of the permit without prior POTW approval;(C) Applicable effluent limits based on categorical pretreatment standardsand local limits;(D) Applicable monitoring, sampling, and reporting requirements;(E) Notification requirements for slug discharges as defined in andSection;403.5(b); and(F) Statement of applicable civil and criminal penalties for violationof pretreatment standards and requirements.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(vii) * * *(B) Pretreatment Requirements which will be enforced through the remediesset forth in paragraph (f)(1)(vii)(A) of this section, will include butnot be limited to, the duty to allow or carry out inspections, entry, ormonitoring activities; any rules, regulations, or orders issued by thePOTW: or any reporting requirements imposed by the POTW or these regulations.The POTW shall have authority and procedures (after informal notice tothe discharger) immediately and effectively to halt or prevent any Dischargeof pollutants to the POTW which reasonably appears to present an imminentendangerment to the health or welfare of persons. The POTW shall also haveauthority and procedures (which shall include notice to the affected IndustrialUsers and an opportunity to respond) to halt or prevent any Discharge tothe POTW which presents or may present an endangerment to the environmentor which threatens to interfere with the operation of the POTW. The ApprovalAuthority shall have authority to seek judicial relief and may also seekadministrative relief when the POTW has sought to seek such relief buthas sought a monetary penalty which the Approval Authority believes tobe insufficient.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(2) * * *(iii) * * * Notify each newly designated Significant Industrial User ofits status and of all requirments applicable to such users within 30 daysafter designation as such.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(v) Randomly sample and analyze the effluent from Industrial Users andconduct surveillance and inspection activities in order to identify, independentof information supplied by Industrial Users, occasional and continuingnoncompliance with Pretreatment Standards. Inspect and sample the effluentfrom each Significant Industrial User that discharges into the POTW atleast every two years, and evaluate, at the time of such sampling or inpsection,whether each such significant industrial user needs a plan to prevent andcontrol slug discharges as defined under andSection; 403.5(b). The resultsof such activities shall be made available to the Approval Authority uponrequest. If the POTW decides that such a plan is needed, each plan shallcontain, at a minimum, the following elements:(A) Description of discharge practices, including non-routine batch discharges;(B) Description of stored chemicals;(C) Procedures for promptly notifying the POTW of slug discharges as definedunder andSection; 403.5(b), with procedures for follow-up written notificationwithin five days;(D) Any necessary procedures to prevent accidental spills, including maintenanceof storage areas, handling and transfer of materials, loading and unloadingoperations, and control of plant site run-off;(E) Any necessary measures for building containment structures or equipment;(F) Any necessary measures for controlling toxic organic pollutants (includingsolvents);(G) Any necessary procedures and equipment for emergency response;(H) Any necessary follow-up practices to limit the damage suffered by thetreatment plant of the environment.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(vii) Comply with the public participation requirements of 40 CFR Part25 in the enforcement of National Pretreatment Standards. These proceduresshall include provision for at least annual public notification, in thelargest daily newspaper published in the municipality in which the POTWis located, of Industrial Users which, at any time during the previoustwelve months, were in significant violation of applicable PretreatmentStandards or Pretreatment Requirements. For the purposes of this provision,an Industrial User is in significant violation if its violations meet oneor more of the following criteria:(A) Chronic violations of wastewater discharge limits, defined here asthose in which sixty-six percent or more of all of the measurements takenduring a six-month period exceed (by any magnitude) the daily maximum limitor the average limit for the same pollutant parameter;(B) Technical review criteria (TRC) violations, defined here as those inwhich thirty-three percent or more of all of the measurements taken duringa six-month period equal or exceed the product of the daily average maximumlimit or the average limit times the applicable TRC (TRC=1.4 for BOD, TSS,fats, oil and grease, and 1.2 for all other pollutants except pH);(C) Any other violation of a pretreatment effluent limit (daily maximumor longer-term average) that the Control Authority believes has caused,alone or in combination with other discharges, intereference or pass through(including endangering the health of POTW personnel or the general public);(D) Any discharge of a pollutant that has caused imminent endangermentto human health, welfare or to the environment and has resulted in thePOTW's exercise of its emergency authority under paragraph (f)(1)(vii)(B)of this section to halt or prevent such a discharge;(E) Violation, by ninety days or more after the schedule date, of a complianceschedule milestone contained in a local control mechanism or enforcementorder, for starting construction, completing construction, or attainingfinal compliance;(F) Failure to provide required reports such as baseline monitoring reports,90-day compliance reports, periodic self-monitoring reports, and reportson compliance with compliance schedules within thirty days of the due date;(G) Failure to accurately report noncompliance; or(H) Any other violation or group of violations which the Control Authorityconsiders to be significant.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(5) The POTW shall develop and implement an Enforcement Response Plan.This Plan shall contain detailed procedures indicating how a POTW willinvestigate and respond to instances of Industrial User noncompliance.At a minimum, this Plan shall:(i) Describe how the POTW will investigate instances of noncompliance;(ii) Describe the types of escalating enforcement responses the POTW willtake in response to all anticipated types of Industrial User violationsand the time periods within which responses will take place;(iii) Adequately reflect the POTW's primary responsibility to enforce allapplicable Pretreatment Requirements and Standards, as detailed in andSection;andSection;403.5 and 403.8(f) (1) and (2).<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 403.10</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended]</ITAG>6. andSection; 403.10 is proposed to be amended by removing the first sentencein paragraph (c).7. andSection; 403.12 is proposed to be amended by adding text to the endof paragraph (h) by revising paragraphs (i)(1), (j), and (n), and addingnew paragraph (p) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;403.12</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Reporting requirements for POTWs and Industrial Users</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(h) * * * Significant Industrial Users shall submit to the Control Authorityat least twice a year a description of the nature, concentration, and flowof the pollutants required to be reported by the Control Authority. Thesereports shall be based on sampling and analysis performed in the periodcovered by the report, and performed in accordance with the techniquesdescribed in 40 CFR Part 136 and amendments thereto. Where 40 CFR Part136 does not contain sampling or analytical techniques for the pollutantin question, or where the Administrator determines that the Part 136 samplingand analytical techniques are inappropriate for the pollutant in question,sampling and analysis shall be performed by using validated analyticalmethods or any other applicable sampling and analytical procedures, includingprocedures suggested by the POTW or other persons, approved by the Administrator.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(i) * * *(1) An updated listed of the POTW's Industrial Users, including their namesand addresses, or a list of deletions and additions keyed to a previouslysubmitted list. The POTW shall provide a brief explanation of each deletion.The list shall identify which Industrial Users are Significant IndustrialUsers and provide a brief explanation of why any noncategorical dischargerwith an average flow of 25,000 gallons per day or more of process wastewaterwas not designated as a Significant Industrial User. The list shall alsoidentify those Industrial Users which are subject to categorical PretreatmentStandards and specify which Standards are applicable to each IndustrialUser.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(j) <T3>Notification of changed discharge.</T3> All Industrial Users shallpromptly notify the POTW in advance of any substantial change in the volumeor character of pollutants in their discharge, including the listed orcharacteristic hazardous wastes for which the Industrial User has submittedinitial notification under andSection; 403.12(p).<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(n) <T3>Provisions governing Fraud and False statements:</T3> The reports requiredto be submitted under this section shall be subject to the provisions of18 U.S.C. section 1001 relating to fraud and false statements and the provisionsof sections 309(c) (4) and (6) of the Act, as amended, governing falsestatements, representation or certifications in reports required underthe Act.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(p) <T3>Notification of the discharge of hazardous wastes.</T3> (1) The IndustrialUser shall notify the POTW, the EPA Regional Waste Management DivisionDirector, and State hazardous waste authorities of any discharge into thePOTW of a substance which is a listed or characteristic waste under section3001 of RCRA. Such notification must include a description of any suchwastes discharged, specifying the volume and concentration of such wastesand the type of discharge (continuous, batch, or other), identifying thehazardous constituents contained in the listed wastes, and estimating thevolume of hazardous wastes expected to be discharged during the followingtwelve months. The notification must take place within 180 days of theeffective date of this rule. This requirement shall not apply to pollutantsalready reported under the self-monitoring requirements of andSection; 403.12(b),(d), and (e).(2) Dischargers are exempt from the requirements of paragraph (p)(1) ofthis section during a calendar month in which they generate no more than100 kilograms of hazardous wastes, unless the wastes are acute hazardouswastes as specified in 40 CFR 261.5(e), (f), (g), and (j). Generation ofmore than one hundred kilograms of hazardous wastes in any given monthrequires a one-time notification. Subsequent months during which the industrialuser generates more than one hundred kilograms of hazardous waste do notrequire additional notification, except for the acute hazardous wastesspecified in 40 CFR 261.5(e), (f), (g), and (j).(3) In the case of new regulations under section 3001 of RCRA identifyingadditional characteristics of hazardous waste or listing any additionalsubstance as a hazardous waste, the industrial user must notify the POTWof the discharge of such substance within 90 days of the effective dateof such regulations, except for the exemption in paragraph (p) (2) of thissection.(4) In the case of any notification made under this paragraph (p) of thissection, the industrial user shall certify that it has a program in placeto reduce the volume and toxicity of wastes generated to the degree ithas determined to be economically practicable and that it has selectedthe method of treatment, storage, or disposal currently available whichminimizes the present and future threat to human health and the environment.<ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 88-26796 Filed 11-22-88; 8:45 am]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 6560-50-M </ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>